For anyone that is still reading this now, I have exactly the same symptoms and find that nothing helps me but porridge. This may sound stupid but I always have porridge in the morning and it eases my stomach pain.
Has anyone experienced symptoms same as above as I feel extremely on my own shouting and no one understanding what im going though
I went back to the doctors on Tuesday 22/10 explained all of the above to her and she said I am to keep taking the tablets and she is happy to see me again in November (once the months course has been taking) however im in dispear with this pain HAD ENOUGH OF FEELING ILL and can't help but think the worse
The pain was so sever I went to the doctors (2 and a half weeks ago), my doctor felt my stomach and said it felt swollen, I told her the symtoms and she says she thinks I have gastritis and prescribed me with Lansoprazole 30mg tablets to take daily for 1 month, this however to date hasn't helped my stomach at all, the flare up comes and goes however the pain in my stomach is constant and the Lansorprazole is causing terrible upset stomach to the point I am worried to not be near a toilet.
About three weeks ago my stomach flared up however to the worst pain I have experienced as yet, made me feel like I was going to be sick constantly and made me not know what to do with myself. I feel like there is a lump in my thought and my stomach feels tender and swollen when flares up feels like my stomach is on fire/knotted up!
"I wondered if anyone could help me, since about January 2013 I have on and off had a dull ache in my stomach, sometimes flaring up to make me feel sick. I actually put this down to anxiety however in the past few weeks my theory has changed.
"Well after I posted on here I followed one of the leads and watched some Jason Klop YouTube clips which lead me to investigate SIBO small intestine bacterial overgrowth. From there I looked into Murdoch University’s FODMAP diet, bought the app and within days everything cleared up. As my Dad died with the same symptoms as I think the stress and pain contributed to his heart failure I so wish I had found all this earlier. I hope this info can at least help some of you
"I’ve had so much terrible for 10 years I’ve had all tests came back gastritis no one helped rid of it for months and months and even when the anti bortic finish I was still bad I’ve changed all my diet I take movicol and they put mine down to I bs but I had my gallbladder out to in 2011 I’m not a well girl at 40 and the headaches I feel my life has changed forever
"OK here's my story. Exactly three years ago I started having burning sensations in my stomach for weeks then it would pass. This went on for about a year. I went for tests ultrasound, bloods and stools. I haven't had a solid poo for years on end. It got me down, almost losing my marriage as I was very down and most of all angry and irritable. I still went to work but it was so hard. I just wanted to be at home l you down. Luckily my child was only a few years old so didn't understand. Doctors put it down to ibs. This was even more frustrating. I then started taking strong probiotics (Holland and barret) and aloe Vera tablets overnight. This was a revelation. I only had a hand full of flare ups in two years which would last just a few days. There has never been any pattern from the start I terms of food. I have however over the last four weeks been in turmoil. Its come back and it feels worse than ever. Burning, trapped wind, depression. Feels like I'm a different man from the happy guy the last two years. I fully understand all how you are feeling. I get angry with my wife my child. Very short fused. I feel like I need to be away from them. I'm thinking of going back to the drs but I almost know he will say ibs. At my wits end again. Dread waking up thinking how the day will pan out.
Now I’m Feb 2018, this year, I started having the same problem. I already eat Paleo and actually more Keto so don’t have any grains or sugars, been doin that for 3 years now. I’m having thre days of pain then only having water and protein shake for a day or two then have two days of relief, then the pain starts again. I’m wondering if anyone here has considered Fecal Transplant Therapy? I know it sounds out there but I’m thinking of seeing if I can get into a trial. I have taken notes of everything everyone here has tried and will start on those and book a doctors appointment. With all the pain and what has happened to my Dad this whole thing just has me so scared and sad.
"hi my name is kellie sherriff my pain been going on for about 2 1/1 years now. It all started with about of gastro that caused the lining of my gut to spasms. Put now I am still waiting for answers I recently just had ecoli posioning that made my guts angry and I lost 7 kgs in under a week through diarrhea and vomiting. I got to be careful what I eat also like deep fried chips from a home cooker with old oil it will make me vomit and my gut spasm. my gut spasms when ever it want to I could be having a conversation with my mum or sister and it spasms or goes as hard as a board. I am still waiting to see a gastroenteriris dr cause my gp has done all she can do by giving me collet tablets for spasms which 95% of the time they don't work. thanks for listening to my story
"Hi there just wondering if you’ve been given relief as of yet. I’m currently going through this exact thing and would be super happy if there was a way to resolve these
"Hi Jenny, I have been reading through this thread and feel for everyone here. My Dad had pain every time he ate solid food from last Feb 2017. He would not eat or only have liquid smoothies for a couple of days then come good. He would then try eating something solid and end up with loads of pain again. He went to a doctor that only gave him a laxative and told him he was having trouble from his divaticulitus. He had had a colonoscopy 6 months earlier as he did yearly. He had had bowel cancer twice twenty years earlier. He eventually had two stints on hospital where they did a CT scan the first time and endoscopy the second time. They told him they were checking his eusophicus the last time which infuriated him as it was his bowel that was having the trouble. They sent him home after a week in hospital and gave him a follow up appointment in two months time. My Dad died of a heart failure at home 5 days after discharge in September last year. I feel from stress of the condition and not being able to eat much for 8 months.
"Has anybody found a cure yet? I have had an awful pain for about a week now. It started near the middle of my esophagus and stomach which landed me in the ER. Now it comes and goes and it’s mainly in the middle of my belly, like where my intestines are. I no longer have diarrhea. Someone’s response on this thread was very similar to mine. When I eat, it gets better. When I don’t it gets worse. I’ve been surviving off of chicken noodle soup crackers and a smoothie made of peaches, papaya and honey. Nothing works. The PA at the hospital prescribed me a stronger dosage of OTC Pepcid which has not helped. I also had an ultradsound done because they thought it was an ulcer. Negative. I’m really worried and petrified that this pain will never be resolved.
"I've felt nauseated everyday for months, but when I ate it did seem to help. This was about 10 years ago. At that time I was told to get my Vitamin D checked. It was very low, and I begin to get Vitamin D shots, and I was so surprised did it help, a lot. And to my surprised my fingernails even begin to grow. I always assumed I was one of those people whose nails just didn't grow. I also had acid re-flux and got on medicine. My stomach still gets upsets from time to time but nothing like it was before. I don't know if this helps, but I wish you all the best.
"I was so relieved to findthis post & all the other discussions on this topic !! I have the same upper abd. Pain, the nausea, the feeling in my tummy like theres a heavy ball in there, then it just aches and all of this has been going on for over a year. Same as so many others, all tests done to date are negative, yet the symptoms remain. Next test is upper GI, but they wanted $1000 before they would schedule it, even with my ins., so haven't been able to have that one. In the mean time, im o n Carafate, protonex, pepcid, mylanta and a probiotic. A friend recently sent me a link about a Kombucha drink. Its a fermented cold drink found in a grocery store. I added that to my arsenal and have had a calming down down of the terrible pain and nausea! I've been a nurse for 36 years but this has me stumped, as well as my doctors. Thank you so much for your posts, i dont feel so all alone in my battle. I will research the other recommendations also. My sister gave me a soup recipethat helps with gallbladder issues, but i did get a good result using it: 2 zucchini 's, 20 green beans, one bunch parsley, & 4-5 stalks of celery. Steam these together for about 10 mins., then puree. I would eat this for lunch and dinner for about 2 days, and the relief was amazing. I slowly add tolerable foods back in as tolerated. For me this works. Im 5 days into my latest flare up, so will make the soup in addition to everything else (meds) and hope for relief. I wish us all relief in whatever works for us!
I hope this helps someone. Its not a cure, but how I have managed to reduce and deal with this pain for the last 4 years. I hope to go to the doctor this coming year and see a specialist and allergy doctor and hopefully one day get a real diagnosis of what is happening to our stomachs!!!
WHEN THE PAIN STARTS, I don't eat anything until the pain goes away I ONLY have sips of water or lemon water. Unfortunately sometimes I will go hours without eating but its worth it because having even a crumb will make my stomach hurt worse. So after hours of only drinking water the pain will start to subdue and then once I feel less or no pain I only have liquid food like Milk, yogurt or cream of chicken soup but don't chug it because you are starving, just take a small spoonful and wait a few minutes to see if it brings the pain back, if not you are safe to eat liquids. I don't eat solid foods until the next day. Also if I am home while waiting for pain to go away it makes my back feel like there is a dagger stabbing me right in the middle. I lay down on my left side with a heating pad on my back and try to take a nap, this is helpful in reducing pain as well.
My doctor prescribed me HYOSCYAMINE for STOMACH SPASMS. THIS HAS BEEN A LIFE SAVER. They are small pills that dissolve under the tongue and the pain will be completely gone with an hour. HOWEVER timing is important because there have been some times i have taken it and it doesn't fully work but it does lessen the pain.
"I don't know if anyone is still reading these responses, but I also have this Mysterious stomach pain. I did actually get diagnosed with H-Pylori about 4 years ago and took the massive amounts of antibiotics to cure it. But i am still having this chronic stomach pain. I've had an endoscopy, ultrasound, gallbladder check. Everything clear. I have tried reading many articles to try and pinpoint the issue. Eating foods that are not too hot or too spicy, cut out coffee. Stay relaxed and not stress out. Every time i think i have it figured out it will mysteriously pop up out of the blue. BUT I have reduced the pain from once a month to just once every couple of months.
"I would just like to say to anybody who found themselves here reading all these posts that sound very familiar to your own symptoms. To please do yourself a HUGE favor and research SIBO and a naturopathic doctor who specializes in IBS/SIBO named Dr. Jason Klop. His page and seminars are free, you just need to sign up for them from his Facebook page. What we are all dealing with, are the results from poor dietary choices we made in our lives, that have caused certain things to happen in our bodies, incorrectly. This is completely 100% reversible with modifications to your diet, which will create the changes needed in your digestive system, which will then alleviate everything from cramps, pain, diarrhea, constipation, sinus issues, migraines, headaches etc...
I'll report back as I make it through my fasting test. In the mean time, good luck to everyone trying something to help themselves. .
From what I've been reading and researching, it should hopefully solve the problem unless I actually have some type of serious issue. I'm 6'6"" 230lbs so fasting isn't easy...lol....but it's all a mindset. All you feel is hunger and your brain trying to make you give up and eat. I can deal with that.
I've done a lot of research on fasting and intermittent fasting having great success in resetting your gut and microbiome. I just ate my last meal (6oz. Flank steak, steamed broccoli and some fresh fruit) at 2pm today. I'm going to fast for 24 hours and then eat 6oz of protein and about 18oz of steamed vegetables and then fast again for 24 hours. Then do intermittent fasting where I only eat betterment noon and 6pm and fast the other 18 hours. Eating only small protein portions and unlimited steamed vegetables during that 6 hours.
I don't drink or smoke. I need to exercise more, but I eat pretty healthy. Lots of fruits and veggies, healthy meat, barely any sugar, no caffeine and organic whenever possible. I drink almost strictly filtered water.
"I can't believe there are so many people with similar symptoms that are being undiagnosed. I've had the symptoms for about 3 weeks and have been scouring the internet looking for answers. My dull pain mostly on my right side under my liver, pulses on and off all day for no reason. I'm being set up for a colonoscopy. Not sure what that will show. The pain is more annoying than anything and is sometimes accompanied by a wave of heat throughout my stomach area. Obviously for most of us, the pain just doesn't feel right...like organ failure or something not right.
Just wondering if your still experiencing gastritis pain? I am currently having extreme burning pain. Meds aren’t helping. In fact my symptoms are getting worse. Thanks
"hi everyone so nice to find this thread !!! And that it's still going talk to me everyone ! I have the same problem I've had it about a month now upper abdomen bloating and pain that doesn't really go away it will settle abit and I get good days but it's swelled up tonight for no reason I've had such a bland meal tried cutting things out of my diet and nothing's working I'm on ranitidine atm which does help a small amount but the dull ache is still there ... I'm going back to the doctors tomorrow I'm so fed up of this constant pain it's getting me down anyone found relief? Doctors think it's gastritis
"Yes your not alone I suffer this too every so often I feel drained with it stomach flairsbup swollen to the point I think I’m going to pop trapped wind ?? absolutly cramping pains in back stomach can hear the wind in stomach poop cream colour I thought it was because I’m taking fat burners still not sure but I drank sea salt water two table spoons and warm water it helped go toilet but I’m still in agony going to try fybogel tomorrow will let u no if works I no the pain 3 days I’ve been crying and wanting to be sick it feels like food stuck just under my breast so tight and stomach massive Xx
"Hi jenny. I have had a similar problem for 6 years with no diagnosis. My pain is severe and I have had it for 8 weeks non -stop this time. I have had all the tests, but now I have them all over again. I'm on ranitadine an osemeprazole, but they don't do much. Tell your doc you want to be referred to a gasterenterologists. For tests. I drink ginger and lemon tea for the nausea and suck crystalised ginger .
"also ultrasound /MRI and blood test all come back clear
"Hiya in so glad Iv found this post Iv also been suffering with the same symptoms feels like there's a lump in my stomach at the top in the middle my pain also moves around sometimes in my right side sometimes left this all started when I had my daughter delivered by c section but over the years the pain has got worse bad wind burning sensation pain like Iv banged my stomach but haven't mine always gets worse when I am due on my monthly cycle about the week before and then when Mother Nature comes it disappeares Iv had blood test /ultrasound /MRI scan and different tablets and nothing works im starting to work my self up as it's on my mind all the time
"Hi Jenny. I will the enzyme supplements a go. I have been prescribed buscopan to relax my gallbladder, but it does nothing for the pain and other symptoms. Thank you.
"So my husband was having symptoms for about a month, upper left abdominal pain, nausea, vomiting, headaches. The stomach pains and nausea was so bad he couldn’t really eat. Lost 30 lbs in the month, went to gastroenterologist had colonoscopy, endoscopy, barium swallow with iodine injection and a motility test and all the blood work!! Everything came back normal!!! I tell my chiropractor the symptoms and she says immediately it’s a spastic gallbladder and gives me Cholacol & Zypan which are bile salts and enzyme supplements that anyone can get online and he’s been taking 2 of each with each meal for a week now and the symptoms are gone!!! They apparently break down the sludge in the gallbladder that is causing the spasms!!! Just FYI so other people might try it also because the spasms won’t show on tests!
I've had a bad mental state for a few weeks now, increasing with every negative test. I've already cut out most food, but I was eating breads as something soft in my stomach. Usually I don't want to eat, id rather just starve if it hurts either way I guess. I'm going to try the home remedies listed above, despite the seeming lack of success overall. I truly am greatful to hear others went through this, but I wish health for every one of you, and am so sorry you're going through this as well.
It's comforting to know others have felt whay you have, but it's also horrible to know it hasn't really improved for anyone. I've lived with chronic pain from endometriosis most of my life now, and with this added on it truly is zapping the will to keep going. I feel so young to say that, and my partner and I wanted to have children in the next two years, but I can't imagine living life constantly like this. I can't imagine starting a family and just having this pain constantly keep me from being apart of my kids life. I can't even focus on tv or conversation half the time, the pain just makes everything else become white noise.
Im scheduled for an ultrasound tomorrow and a GI specialist in a week or so, but I don't have much hope right now.
"I am yet another with the same situation hitting me hard. It's been over 2 months now without being able to eat anything without pain or discomfort. I've been to urgent care several times, my GP as well, had blood, fecal, urin, xrays all done and all came back negative. I've been put on a total of 8 new medications to see what works with no noteworthy success. Wearing a bra, tight shirts, or buttoning up jeans are all out of the question, and the nausea/pain doesn't fade with any particular way or sitting or Laying or standing or pills or what I eat/what I dont. It just fades to a flu like sickness, before increasing every few hours to unbearable.
I have a type of autoimmune disease where my body killed all my hydrochloric acid productions beta cells so I have severe Gastritis symptoms. Besides taking the pills, I have had to go off all foods except protein and veggies- all in small amounts. Funny thing is though, I keep gaining weight! It’s really discouraging. Anyways, if you see this I hope you are better!
"Hi jenny. I have had a similar condition for 6 years with no diagnosis as yet. I had intermittent pain for weeks on end having to take strong painkillers which eventually made me ill. I feel sick everyday and have to take nausea tablets. This week I can only lay on the couch or to go to bed with a hot water bottle. I bought a electric one.I have been though manty tests over the last 6 years and still don't know what it is. I have had three stomach ulcers in the past and gastritis and duodenitis . I feel severe pain all the time too and can't help thinking the worse. I was recently diagnosed with diverticulitis, but its not that' pain in the wrong place. Other people don't realise how bad the pain is. I have had my appointment with the Gastroenterologist brought forward to October the 17th and it can't come soon enough.. I will probably have to have another camera down my stomach. Even though I don't like hospitals, I wish I could go in now and have the tests.
"Oh my goodness! Another person who knows what I experience!! I’ve had this exact problem for 2 years now, it’s been getting worse as time goes by, seeing a stomach specialist on Tuesday 3rd. My main concern is that I can’t carry on like this because I am in my final year of high school (I am 16 years old, and a boy) and the problem is taking such a strain on my education. I’ve had to go from having dairy to no dairy, and now turned vegan, this is due to ALL FOODS giving me a stomach ache, and tablets that don’t do anything for me! How’s your problem now, I got diagnosed with gastritis age 10, but became a massive problem after I got back from France in 2015! Hope you are doing better, and wonder if you have any tips because I can’t carry on like this
"Hi everyone. Just another person living with this horrible illness. Mine started out as a flu/sore throat (an infection which I still interestingly have today) in which I was prescribed antibiotics. Halfway through the course I began experiencing bloating and painful stomach gurgling which came on all of a sudden. This continued on for a few weeks so I ceased the antibiotics because I was convinced it was giving me the terrible pain (knowing full well the implications of not finishing the pack). I then started experience severe upper abdominal pain that was just below my sternum and would creep under my left rib cage (when it got really bad). When it was really bad my stomach would spasm just with my rib pressing on it when expanding to breathe. It also would make awful gurgling/spasming noises which made me very anxious at work knowing people could hear it! (And my pants unzipped at work because of the bloating wasn't a good look) i self diagnosed myself with a lot of gas and starting taking de-gas along with other over the counter meds like buscopan to no avail. I finally went back to the gp to have my stomach looked at and he made me do a stool test (which was pos for Aeromonas and blastocystis hominis). He then started me on more antibiotics, ciprofloxacin and promised me my symptoms would subside! Phew I thought!! Well..... unfortunately my symptoms didn't subside and I was referred to have an upper ultrasound done to test liver function, gall bladder and pancreas - results ALL CLEAR as were my blood tests. I was then referred to a gastro specialist that told me that my symptoms were quite ""vague"" - my bowel movements were normal at this stage and he would need to investigate further with an endoscopy/colonoscopy. The procedure came back fine- only a single erosion ulcer on my terminal ileum but no evidence of crohns, U/C etc. h pylori biopsy also negative. Following this test I began to have some strange bowel movements- a blood globule in my stool and often white mucous (booked into my specialist straight away but couldn't get in for a few weeks) I was convinced that my problems were also diet related, not that I was unhealthy beforehand but thought with all my doctor google research, cutting gluten and dairy out could help. I followed the low FODMAPS diet and further the auto immune paleo diet for about 2 months (with a nutritionists support) along with some omega ease and high strength probiotics which she prescribed but didn't see any improvement unfortunately. I continued living in pain and desperation for another month until I decided to make another appointment despite the surgeon saying I was ""fine"". He is now suggesting a pill cam test to rule out small bowel Crohn's disease (family history) and in the meantime start on colofax to soothe the symptoms. Interestingly enough he also suggested I start taking a small dose of an anti depressant that has worked ""miracles"" for those suffering with chronic pain and IBS. He seems to think that this whole thing has been brought on my anxiety or stress (which I must admit I am quite a worryer and have started a new job in the last 6 months so it is possible) however I can't help but think something is really wrong with my health. Just wondering if anyone else has experienced symptoms like these or has a way to manage the pain? It almost seems like the unknown is just as bad as the illness itself.
"Wow, definitely seems that I'm not the only one that's having these problems! As you can see my username is July 19. That's when I first started with this pain as well. Yes, it's been pretty tough and still going though it as we speak. Have a docs appointment this morning as he gave me meds for the ulcers, infection etc..: hasn't worked and I did forget to mention he did referred me for a ultrasound for my liver and gallbladder: results negative, as well as blood work negative. Changed my diet, did lose weight of course! But when I lay down is when it bothers me the most. I'm at work and I get flare ups and yes it's very frustrating! I will have my doctor to do a full blood count to check other organs and a endoscope. I did try baking soda with lemons and for some reason it made me burp and pass gas a lot more. Did feel good for at least 8 hours and then the pain re- surfaces again😩
"Hi Jenny I am wondering if you ever got to the bottom of this.i am in hospital at the moment. I am in severe pain after eating which leads me to feel very sick and no longer dare to touch another food.
"Had insomina for three night , I suffer with aniexty and panic attacks, so I got aniexty because of lack of sleep , with anxiety I get aCid reflux so now that I felt like sleeping I could not because of the acid reflux and aniexty , it was not going and got worst even after natural methods , like ginger tea and baking soda , so I decided to take make aloes Juice, well I believe I did not follow with the methos to mix it and made it very strong and felt weak , oh before taking aloes my lower stomach felt heated as well, any ways I took pills for the acid refluxs that same day an hour apart and it helped a lot , must say I took nexium some days before and it never helped. So because I normally get aCid reflux from aniexty , and it normally goes away and I can eat anything when it goes , I ate anything for two day and it came back worst than before, took the tablets I took that helped and it was not much help , began drinking coconut water , and ginger tea through out the day and it helped a bit , ended up drinking an alcoholic beverage and just a sip burned right through me , it got worst , my aniexty give me headaches and I got light headed, took the same tablet and nothing , next '2 day felt light headed and my stomach felt raw , could not walk to far and it burned , decided to follow instructions on how to use the aloes, the last time I felt weak and the aloes made me itchy , this time I made it and put cucumber, and coconut water and not an aloes and that same day the burning in my lower abdomen stopped , second day I'm not holding my stomach while I walk , I plan to take it for atleast a month to see what happens . StI'll gonna check a doctor though. Also felt dull pains on and off in my lower stomach and once in a while a little movement while my stomach burned
I have reduced to 20mg and for the last week I have taken a 20 billion probiotic along with a small probiotic drink every morning. Since taking the probiotics I have seen a marked improvement in the symptoms ( not gone but 75% better). I shall continue this with fingers crossed
My problem is that my upper stomach was still very sore to touch with repeated burping and chest pain. I asked if the PPI could cause this and the gastrologist said it's possible and suggested changing to another type or reducing them.
I was also given an upper GI and pelvic scan which was clear.
The repeat endoscopy found the gastritis almost cleared and the polyp almost gone.
This found erosive gastritis and a small polyp. I was prescribed a 3 month course of a PPI 40mg and had a repeat endoscopy 2 weeks ago.
Recently my symptoms have returned but testing this time proved negative. Due to a family history of stomach cancer and the connection to it with H-Pylori my GP referred me for an endoscopy.
My symptoms are very similar to yours and I have had 3 bouts of this over the years.
I am so glad I am not alone. About 3 month ago this pain started. So debilitating. Some days are more severe than others. Pain is like a band around my upper stomach and back. If I had to pinpoint the pain, it is in the upper center. Been to GP and ER. Had endoscope, colonosopy, CT with dye, and xray. Endoscope came back with diverticulosis, and scar from ulcer, as well as bile reflux (gallbladder removed in 2013). Colonoscopy came back with some thinning of intestine but no polyps. CT showed nothing other than constipation and Xray just showed air (gas). I was given Diludad (sp?) but did nothing for the pain. 2nd ER gave me Fentinal (sp?) did nothing except hallucinate-ick! Just had parathyroidectomy a week ago. Was hoping to find relief as abdominal pain is one of the many symptoms. But no-still am getting the pain. Eating, not eating doesn't make a difference. Can't find triggers for the pain. Sometimes Norco with help but other times it will not make a dent in the pain. Tried beet juice, and aloe juice, but do not notice a difference. Same with peppermint tea and ginger tea. I am quitting my job as I do not know when I will feel ok to work. I feel so discouraged and overwhlemed. Why can't anyone help us or care to? I have to keep trying. I have found massaging my colon helpful for bloat. I try to do it for 20 minutes. If anything helps, even for a bit, I will post it. Good luck.
"I've got gastritis also. I wake up nauseous almost everyday. I read that raw honey, if you take it before you eat, it helps. I'm going to try that. My endoscopy showed slight inflammation in my stomach. If I don't keep something on my stomach about every 2 hours in the morning I get very nauseous.
"WOW IM SO RELIEVED TO SEE OTHERS I CAN RELATE TOO IVE BEEN SO MISERABLE AND BREAKING DOWN CRYING IVE BEEN DEALING WITH THE SAME THING FOR A YEAR NOW THIS YEAR HAS GOTTEN WORST THE PAIN AND BURNING NAUSEOUS VOMITING ALWAYS FEELING SICK NOW I HAVE SHOOTING PAINS IN MY LEGS AND ARMS CHEST PAINS AND LOWER BACK PAIN ON MY RIGHT SIDE SOMETIMES IVE BEEN TO HOSPITAL AFTER HOSPITAL DOCTORS AFTER DOCTORS IVE HAD NUMEROUS OF TEST DONE ENDO AND COLON CAT SCANS BLOOD WORK X RAYS AND NOTHING IM ONLY 30 AND THEY KEEP GIVING ME DIFFERENT MEDS TO TRY LIKE IM A GENIE PIG I JUST WANT MY LIFE BACK I HATE THIS HAS ANYBODY FOUND ANYTHING OUT YET MY LOWER INTESTINE WAS SWOLLEN AND THEY DIDNT ELABORATE ON IT IS THAT BAD ?
"Demand a ulta sound or mri, ct scan, my doctors fobed me of for years saying i had reflux and gave me lanzrapol not they done any good, i had exact same syptoms as you, finaly got a ultra sound done they showed gal-bladder stones, went for a camera and they removed some stones from my bile duct, the very next morning rushed back into hospital diagnosed with pancreatitius, stayed in hospital for week then they removed my gal bladder but again got panreatitus, then said i sycst on the pancreas sent home after few weeks now been for anohter ct scan and now awaiting the resluts regarding the sycsts to see what is happenign with them, but i must say i do not get any pain for now since the removal, I do get a cramp that lasts for about 30 seconds thats it tho i can live with that
"Thanks jess diet change is defo helping it's just hard to accept you have to eat little and stuff that you don't really want but I'm taking movicol it helps me go poo every day I just wish I could sleep better still on lots of pillows
"Hi Jenny my name is Jessica and I've been going through what you've been going through for almost 3 years when I first started I was about 250 lb and now I'm about 140 lb would mind first started and started with a lump in the very top of my stomach that made me get very nauseous and feel like I had to poop and it happened every single day all day long I threw up everything I was eating couldn't keep anything down and when I went to the hospital all they do was drug me out and I'd wake up 8 hours later mad because the whole day was gone this happened for maybe two years before I went online and tried to find other people who are going through the same thing that I was going through I finally found a form on gastritis that implemented some of the things that you should be eating in the things that you should stay away from and would that last I compiled a diet that worked for me basically I don't know if you guys have those smart one meals at Kroger's or the Weight Watcher meals but basically I would eat two of those a day I would have a banana and yogurt in the morning and then fill in my snack times with fruits and vegetables and that seemed to work with me I've actually broken my diet and my symptoms are starting to come back almost every day so I believe the diet really does help and I think if you want to start feeling better it starts with going on a diet it sucks but that's the solution to this problem.
"Had no idea how many people have all my symptoms. I am going to try the acidophilus plus you mentioned. I have had this crummy pain since last August. Had the Xrays, ultrasound, CT abdominal scan. Finally I had a surgeon go in, laparoscopicly and look around. NOTHING! My gut is so sore, almost feels numb! Hard to ride in the car because i feel all the bumps. Thanks for your post. Very helpful. Misery loves company.
"I have been suffering so bad get 3 hours sleep then the pain comes on so strong in my abdominal it feels deep inside if I lay on tummy it radiates through to back laying on my side hurts I breath out hard and I can feel my sides hurting sometimes I go poo it feels better I've been on nexium 6 years for feeling acid had to sleep sitting up 6 years recently stopped nexium for barium was ok but 2 weeks later I'm in agony in my abdominal got a small amount of blood in poo protein in wee borderline irritable bowel I've had too lots of antibiotics recently and nothing have helped I've had camera down throats over and over and they found mild gastritis then nothing but nexium gave heart palpertations sweats in night and still pain im getting to point I want to die but I have to young children
"My doctor prescribe me rantidine, you could try that, he said take it for two weeks twice a day half an hour before eating, not sure if that's helpful but it's worth a try.
"Hi Jenny your symptoms are very much like mine although I get very bad acid reflux too I was in a&he a couple of nights due to the pain in my stomach I had an appointment with a specialist the following day so the a&be department let me go so I could go to the appointment when I went there and described my symptoms they said it could be an ulcer or inflammation due to the amount of medication I take I am having an endoscopy done this Monday coming so hopefully I will get the results the same day I have not long had my dinner and my stomach is in so much pain I feel for you I really do I think your docter should have sent you for further investigations if you have got a diagnosis could you please let me know out of interest and if you haven't I will tell you my results after my camera too all the best to you just realised your post was over a year ago
"I literally was just diagnosed with a ""bacterial overgrowth"" in my small intestine. This was done by having a breath test, which was super easy to do. I've been sick since October 2016. It's been a nightmare of gut pain every day, especially since they couldn't find any h-pylori in my stomach after my endoscopy in December. But due to my symptoms they scheduled the test and it looks like they've been hiding in my intestines. I'm wondering if that's normal? Anyways they're putting me on biaxin for two weeks. I can't wait to heal up, and I'm especially happy to know I'm not crazy! Keep following up with your doctors folks-no matter how long you've been sick or how bleak your pain makes your situation seem. May we all start to feel better soon!
I feel your sorrow and I would just love to share because I was in the same shoes and thought my life was ending so i would love to help.
If you had figured out what you had? I have the same symptoms for 3 years!!! It's ruining my life. Doctors say I have nothing. But it's uncomfortable pain. Please let me know any information
"Hi Jenny , I was wondering if there has been anymore developments with your stomach. I have been having severe pains in mine and find it difficult to breathe. I've put it down to anxiety as well . I feel everything is bruised inside. My back and ribs are sore too. Doctors say it's IBS but I feel it's something else. I've taken xanax to see if it will calm my stomach down but no joy I'm also on pantoprazole 40mg , but I don't feel any better. It is draining and I feel tired all of the time. Please let me know if anything worked or helped you.
I am feeling the same right now. I was told by my doctor that I have gastritis and gave my prescription Lansoprazole Actavis 30 mg once daily for 4 weeks. I am taking the prescription religiously 30/60 before meal. But pain in my stomach never go away and it is more painful at night tine. I am so sore.
I have been have the stomach pain since last week and I went to the hospital. They did a bunch of tests and found nothing. I don't know what to do. It bothers me so much and I have an appointment on Wednesday. It is very upsetting that I have no answers. Someone please help!!!
"Yeah this has happened to me too.
"Jenny did you ever get this resolved or find the name of your illness? This is Donna in Edmonton Alberta Canada. Ive been sick since August of last year and in November it took a turn for the worse. I had to cut out all sugar fats and ate next to nothing just bottles of water all day long. I dont see a gastrointestinal internal specialist till Feb 8th. I lost 20 lbs in 30 days. They too gave me lansoprazole but it does not stop the pain. I think its pancreatitis as my pancreas enzyme levels were too high for awhile. No dr. I see seems to care or want to help.
"Thanks Shannon, I think kefir is coconut yoghurt, is that correct? My wife has tried that an she did enjoy it. The most beneficial thing for her has been the slippery elm bark whenever she strays off her diet. Hope you and your mom feel better. Cheers Gipsy
My mom seems to have to exact symptoms as your wife. Although she hasn't been 'cured', as well as following a diet like your wife, since she started drinking Kefir every morning she found that this helped settle her stomach a lot more. I am also having stomach problems and I find kefir to be really soothing, and puts my day off to a good start. I really recommend it! Hope your wife's feeling a lot better.
After years of difficulty my wife has gradually got better to the extent she is mostly free of trouble until she strays off the diet and she's back there again. A couple of years ago she had accute pancreatitis and the docs and I were very worried, they said alcohol is about 80% the cause (but she never has alcohol) and the other 20% is unknown cause. That doesn't mean she is not sick... just the docs don't know why, so try the dietry changes and see if that helps. She has gone off Lipitor (cholesterol lowering drug) and has had a remarkable turnaround.
"Hi Jenny, hope you are feeling better but my wife has had a horrible process of doctors, tests and the like with nothing conclusive over 10 years now. Just a couple of ideas: get your doc to test for helicobactor pelori, (causes ulcers), try gluten free, ond lactose free for a while (at least a month), look up the fodmap diet (some foods are really bad for this) and the best first aid is to use slippery elm bark for a few weeks and see if that helps... it puts a lining on your stomach.
I also have a friend that was diagnosed with celiacs disease in her late 20s. Severe stomach pains and stomach swelling were one of her symptoms. It took her almost a year to figure it out. Anyway, I hope you've found an answer and have started feeling better.
I don't know if you're still checking these posts, but I thought I'd share my experiences. I'd had severe stomach pains, stomach swelling, and similiar symptoms to what you've experienced. I dealt with it for about 3 years and saw dozens of doctors and specialists before I got a diagnosis. Turns out I have insulin sensitivity. Although I'm not diabetic, my body doesn't agree with higher levels of insulin. I was put on a low sugar diet (max 50 gram of sugar a day) for 6 months, and after that I was able to gradually increase my sugar intake (to something a little more reasonable). After 2 weeks of the new diet, I started feeling marginally better. By 2 months I felt significantly better, and by 6 months I felt normal again. I've always eaten healthy in general, so this diagnosis seemed like bullsh*t when I got. But its the only thing that worked. Genetics just dealt me a bad hand, I guess. Anyway, I follow the diet plan that people with Type II Diabetes follow. Unlike diabetics, someone with Insulin Sensitivity can get away with cheating on the diet once or twice a week. I just don't do it regularly. I also found out that soy irritates my stomach. But that's a totally separate issue. But anyway, the symptoms were similiar though less severe.
"Jenny! I hope you read this message because I have had the exact symptoms as you for more than I year now. Its gotten to the point where I feel like I'm starving myself but I can rarely get food down. As you said I'm sick of this and can't deal with it any longer. Did any of the suggestion work for you or have you found another solution ?? All my fingers and toes crossed
"Yes Jenny I have had constant stomach pain for two yrs it never goes I go to bed with it and get up with it had eleven colonoscopy sin fifteen yrs as well as numerous other tests just seems there is no hope just constant suffering hope you fare better than me Just keep hoping regards Shirley
"Jenny do you have a diet list although I went wheat,gluten and dairy free for three months and it made no difference Regards Shrley
"You have to be your own advocate and demand certain test be done...that's my experience anyway and shop around for a good GI doctor, there are some lousy ones. And I will say...diet is HUGE when it comes to this, along with staying away from alcohol.
she is set for ct scan now and this daily pain already braught our family to a standstill.
"Scary to see that problem started to my wife 14 days ago can go for several yrs.
"Yes Jenny I've had trouble for twenty years and still having trouble had tests and they say nothing showing up had eleven colonoscopy sin sixteen yrs just seems no end to it.I have diverticulosis and hiatus hernia constant medication including lanasaprole but still no relief hope you do better regards Shirley
"Thanks Jenny but I've had 11colonoscopies in the last 16 yrs and I have among other complaints diverticulitis been suffering for twenty yrs nothing helps I'm now on morphine patches for my back so I wish u all the best Shirley
"I see you wrote this a long time ago so I hope by now you're ok. You're doctor stinks and you need to get a new one. I've been dealing with GI problems for 13 years and I've learned you have to be your own advocate, put your foot down and demand an endoscopy. Some doctors just like to throw pills at people and tell them to come back in a month, meanwhile , the patient is still suffering damaging their insides. Stress, alcohol, smoking, diet, and anti inflammatory drugs can cause gastritis and make it worse. I hope this helps a bit. Oh and you can't really diagnose gastritis without the proper testing so not only does your doctor stink, she sounds very lazy.
I'm not implying that this IS all in your head and the doctors are right but I personally needed harsh truthful eye opening words to wake me up from the dark cloak I had that I kept feeding. I'm being open about personal things only to help, this isn't easy for me but you matter. The world needs you. It takes the same amount of energy to think positive. It's not easy, it's a journey. I'm not there myself, or anywhere close to it. I am my own worst enemy. Imagine if we obsessed over the things we loved about ourselves instead.
I've been in and out of the ER for the past 2 weeks. I'm a changed bird. I've reached my limit but when I hear myself beating myself up for my life/illnesses/situation/the unfair shortened life; I stop. Breathe and remeber there's a reason I'm given this challenge. Pitting yourself isn't the answer. Take it from someone who has already tried suicide. It is NOT the answer. And I'm not saying you are thinking such thoughts but pain makes you into a person you don't even recognize. Especially when no one can give you at least an answer or the time to think of anything else but the obvious.
"Hi, I'm sorry your are going trough so much. I'm a 27 yr old survivor. I've lost most of my family due to other people's actions. I've had pulmonary embolisms, died once, stokes, ulcerative colitis, hair loss, debilitating pain, unable to keep a job and so much more. Sheer pain does crazy things to the mind. It has cause me not only actual pain but phantom pain too because once the mind can't handle the pain in begs your body to do something. Sometimes a small dose of an antidepressant helps. I'm on a child dose. Took a while to find the proper drug and dose but it has helped with many anxiety, fear, depression, pain and other things I never thought I had or could be helped with. I know being told ""you're crazy"" and it's all in your head is like a knife to the heart when you feel physical pain. I've heard it so so so many times! Like you're just talking to walls when you're desperate.
"Have had constant stomach pain for two years have had eleven colonoscopies and nothing is being found I have diverticulosis,hiatus hernia,arthritis,cysts on kidneys. I have been going to my GPevery week who has given me lots of different pain killers and nothing is working l suffer with constipation and laxatives make it worse.I am awaiting latest CT COLONOSCOPY RESULTS but expect them to tell me I have diverticulitis . I am eighty yrs old and feel my life is over as I lay on the bed all day every day,cannot go out due to the pain. can anyone please help me I am desperate Have even been to psychiatrist who said it was a mental problem and now everyone I see keeps harping on this fact I think they don't really listen to me and just think it's a mental condition I have depression through the pain it's driving me mad.went on a wheat gluten and lactose free diet for three months which made no difference so I can know what you are going through If you find anything that helps please let me know
"Hi Jenny! I'm in my 3rd week with the same pain! Have you found anything new out? I'd love to hear from you if you have.
"Hello jenny I've been having the same set of symptoms and problems for the last 2-3weeks and was wondering if you found what the problem really was or anyways to calm the pain as i can not sleep at night due to my current condition...
"Hello Sarah after reading ur post I have to say I FEEL YOUR PAIN!!!! Literally. I have had stomach issues my whole life as far back as I can remember however over the years just got worse and worse eventually it got so bad I went to the Dr had colonoscopy and endoscopy and turns out I have gastritis with GERD (gastro esophageal reflux disorder) very painful I am on pantaprazole as well and I've been on it for about 3 months and finally I found RELIEF!!! Yes it took a while and did I think it was ever going to end NO! Also I found that taking tums and other antacids is not good especially if you have gastritis if I was you I would stop taking them so the pantaprazole has a chance to start working without other stuff messing with it so you can notice a difference. Good luck to you and I hope everything works out for you. If you have any questions feel free to ask I'm quite a bit older then you so I ha e a little more experience with LIFE.
"Omg I'm so glad I found this thread!...I'm 27 and I to have been having stomach issues....I have never had issues ever until two months ago at the end of summer I started having this clearing throat sensation... I had partied alot over summer..At first I thought it was my lungs as I was having heavy breathing it felt like someone was squeezing My chest and my back felt like it was on fire... Turns out it was a silent reflux so the doctor said .. within a week I was having burning pain iny upper left part of my stomach that would go into my back while still having the squeezing in my chest. I ended up in the er 7 times over a month in so much pain I didn't know what to do with myself...had ultrasound done another chest x-ray blood work all Came back fine no hpylori... The think it's gastritis, or ulcers, or a hiatal hernia... I have been waiting for a endoscopy for a month now finally in 6 days I will have one...been extremely stressed out as I'm worried I have stomach cancer..... Unlikely yes is what I've been told...but I am an anxious worries person in general when it comes to my health....lost my mom to bileduct cancer 3 years ago so it's very touchy subject... I also have three little girls whom I love more then anything and am scared something will happen to me... I have lost 20 pounds in the last two months from all this not wanting to eat because of pain or when I finally have an appetite I get more pain everyday has been a flare up. I have been on 80mg of pantaprazole a day and 300mg of zantac a day plus Tums and or gaviscon.. I hate taking meds and have read up on how bad they can be for your gut.. honestly the internet can be a scary thing when googling your symptoms...I am hoping they will find the cause of all this and I can get back to feeling like me again..I have changed everything in my diet trying to feel better so far nothing is working . I quit smoking,drinking and im eating super healthy. I am staying away from gluten just to see of it helps. Made and apt with a naturopath bit that isn't till Feb I really hope this clears up by then.. I'm tired of people thinking I'm crazy because all my tests have come back normal yet this burning stomach pain will put me in tears . They say calm down an don't stress it's kinda hard not to when you don't know what's wrong. Really hoping for some answers reading this thread has helped me knowing im not alone out there.
One night in bed I felt a slowly growing ache in my stomach to the point I thought I was going to vomit, but never did. Since then I have had a fairly constant ache everywhere in my abdomen including under my ribs, my hips, groin, lower back, and upper stomach. The pain is hard to explain because while there is a bit of nausea, it is mainly dull aches with some sharper pains in the areas I mentioned. The back aches are like when you get the flu, or when you wake up in the morning and you've really have to urinate so bad that've your lower back aches. I am guessing it's the kidneys? The pain moves around randomly and with different intensity. I have started the process of tests but it is scary. MY mind races with the fear of some cancer.
I have a similar situation, but it has only gone on for about 5 weeks.
I do not know if I will ever get better but I still have positive mind and have faith in God. keep praying, you may never know... miracles do happen...
Anyway for the last one year I have completely stopped all kind of medicine as I am quite positive that prolonged medicine consumption had infact worsened my condition. Though I am still having this problem but I do have some comfort knowing that I do not depends on tablets anymore, in reality problem persist with or without. I too has completely removed spicy food from my diet and stopped consuming alcohol. I have reduced overseas and oustation trip drastically, this somehow affected my business but I don't have a choice, guess people like us have to make alot of sacrifices to adjust our lifestyle. Sometimes I do envy those who are able to eat/drink anything they like or travel wherever they want to.
"Hi Olga, your condition appears to be very similiar to mine and truly i too at times do have the same feeling.. I do understand what you are going through. Sometimes I pray hard to make this problem disappear completely but sadly it does not work. I have been suffering from this 'mysterious' gastritis for almost 30 years now. I have seen 4 GE, done endo and colono few times but only end up consuming more and more medicine but never improve in long term, only temperorary relief. Imagine detected and treated with H Pylori 3 times through out. I have gone for yoga classess, breathing exercise, meditation etc. but yet to recover from this cursed problem.
"Hello I have had this exact same problem over the last year and I finally went to the Dr and found out I too have gastritis and I was prescribed pantaprazole and it helps have not experienced any stomach discomfort from it and the only down side is it causes a little drowsiness even more so when I first began taking it. Maybe you should talk to ur Dr about it.
"Jenny, did your doctor ever do a breath test for fructose, lactose & gluten? I have had the same problem and they have found out that I am fructose intolerance and I have to stay away from anything that has corn syrup in it. You might want to ask the doctor about that test. Also have you tried any probiatics?
"I know it has been a long time since you wrote this, but I am having the same pain, and I live in Oregon. I am open to anything! Please tell me how you are ingesting it... Candy, drinks... Etc.. I would love to know. Is it just cbd, or thc as well. Thank you!
"Hi Jenny, and guys, i have similar constant dull aches when i specifically ate chilli, highy processed potato chips, certain or too much vegetables like spinich, peanut and milk. My only relieve is by eating (Red) Dragon Fruit, lots of it. And by the way i dont take any western medicine at any cost. I dont recommend eating fruits too acidic like pineapple to much or watermelon as some may have allergic. Dragon fruit (red) which i found to be the best for clearing my system and relieve my pains. My 2 cents guys. Thanks.
"I used to have the same symptoms you're describing. Mine seemed to be related to coffee consumption. I found out because I had to go a week without coffee when camping with my family. After stopping drinking coffee my stomach swelling and aching diminished. I still get flare ups if I eat something dense like a breakfast sandwich or any type of sausage. Don't understand it myself but not sure if you were still in the dark or not. Hoping maybe my experience helps.
"Hello, do you know when ultrasound is not enough to find the cause of stomach pain ? They didn't find anything, so maybe I should put the camera inside ? I'm just worried to do it for no reason, it seems to often happen that they don't find anything even with the camera ? Please help <3
"I have the same problem I'm wondering if maybe u had a c section or tubal or any stomach surgeries I feel as though I'm being stabbed in the same place constant pressure really hurts to sit up or lay on my back I'm losing my mind I'm so tired I passed out making our bed this morning when I go to the restroom to its pressure I haven't been hungry I try to eat as I am breastfeeding
"Wow, I have almost the same issues that you all have been discussing. To add on, I do have an umbillical hernia which gets really sore during flare-ups! My story is similar to Jenny's and some others. I have had these flare-ups for the last 9-10 months. I've had an ultrasound, endoscopy and colonoscopy and all three were clear. The episodes have been long (lasting a week) or short a day or so. I've varied the types of food (greasy, fatty, spicy, bland, etc) and there is rhyme or reason as to when ""it"" wants to flare-up. I did get a prescription for hyocyamine that dissolves under your tongue. I'm supposed to take it 3 times a day. I really don't see much improvement. I thought it was working and I had no flare-ups for 4-5 weeks, and then ""bam"", I had the worse one yet that lasted about a week. BTW, its swolen abdomen, rolling waves of cramps & pain and eating makes it worse. All I can say is, keep up the fight and hopefully and prayerfully there is a cure that will arise!
"Know I'm bumping an old thread but a lot of your symptoms sound similar to mine. Any update on how you're doing now?
"I have a 3 year old that has been dealing with this gastritis for quite some time.. . There's a lot of food she cannot eat. I tell everybody that she's allergic to food because of how much food that she cannot take in. But she takes a probiotic that helps the stomach with the gastritis. So to the people that do you have gastritis that is a very good things to take in as a probiotic. I have a 2 month old that is taking a probiotic too. I would like to see that from other people that have it with their children??
I have the similar complaints as you do? How are you now and did you find any recovery?
Also, I have realized that at the end of july every year since about middle school I have gotten a lot of stomach and bowel issues during the end of july. I was wondering if you experienced anything similar to that. I havent found a solution yet but I am taking probiotics which help a little bit, I also have prescription strength anti nauseau pills and I am still searching for an answer. I was wondering if you have ever had the chicken pox, since I got them when I was in 4th grade and I feel like that is when all of my stomach problems started.
I have literally the same story as you. I started having acid reflux symptoms in about 4th grade after I developed the chicken pox. My stomach has not been the same since. I have been diagnosed with celiacs and lactose intolerance as well as IBS and put on loads of different ant acids and still I havent improved. I also got an endoscopy where nothing was found. I was wondering if you had found any solutions that helped you?
I went back to the doctors on Tuesday 22/10 explained all of the above to her and she said I am to keep taking the tablets and she is happy to see me again in November (once the months course has been taking) however im in dispear with this pain HAD ENOUGH OF FEELING ILL and can't help but think the worse
The pain was so sever I went to the doctors (2 and a half weeks ago), my doctor felt my stomach and said it felt swollen, I told her the symtoms and she says she thinks I have gastritis and prescribed me with Lansoprazole 30mg tablets to take daily for 1 month, this however to date hasn't helped my stomach at all, the flare up comes and goes however the pain in my stomach is constant and the Lansorprazole is causing terrible upset stomach to the point I am worried to not be near a toilet.
About three weeks ago my stomach flared up however to the worst pain I have experienced as yet, made me feel like I was going to be sick constantly and made me not know what to do with myself. I feel like there is a lump in my thought and my stomach feels tender and swollen when flares up feels like my stomach is on fire/knotted up!
"I wondered if anyone could help me, since about January 2013 I have on and off had a dull ache in my stomach, sometimes flaring up to make me feel sick. I actually put this down to anxiety however in the past few weeks my theory has changed.
"Glad I found this thread, I've had similar symptoms leading up to today where I had the biggest flareup so far which has left my left abdomen sore and bruised. I've had the h.ployi, bloods and stools back negative, waiting on endoscopy and colonoscopy now. However I'm being to think it may be crohns given my history with ibs. My flare up today was from oatmeal, which I've eaten successfully throughout my ordeal so no clues
"I started off like this same tablets for over 3 months they didnt help at all so came off them now when i eat i get side and back pain that lasts for few days this happens every time i eat
I have no appetite and I sweat uncontrollably, yet I'm freezing
My stomach is super tight feeling, as well as extremely inflamed. I believe I have ulcers as well.. Hence why I'm in so much pain
I can't even go to work, can barely stand.
I'm in severe pain and I went to the dr- I got no medicine- he said I can't help u here and sent me away
I'm literally crying non stop
I've had this problem for years but it's never been as bad as it is now
"Im literally about to freak out
I'm stuggling to look after my kiddies .. Some days I feel not to bad
I've had h pylori test bloods scan on kidneys nothing founds.. The pain moves around from one side to the other.. could this be gastritis???
I do suffer with anxiety which I think makes me worse.
But a few days later it seemed to move to my stomach I generally don't feel sick and don't have any burning or reflux but a uncomfortable stomach lots of trapped gas in upper stomach and ribs.. sometimes like im holding my stomach in and a little constipated.
I am 5 half months post partum and about 8 weeks ago I started with a kidney infection i was on antibiotics for 8 days ..
I have some similar symptoms
"Hi. Could it be ibs? I'm having pain in my back an in my belly sharp pains constant! For days hospital dun blood tests urine tests..my stomach bloated ..he said in end it maybe ibs an to go docs...Iv cum home an everytime I eat it send sharp pains in my tummy the pain is so severe!! . No sickness jus worse pain like contractions! I took buscipone an it did help! But I need to go dctrs ..Jus can't at mo coz I'm e haste with the pain. Try buscipone c if it helps x
"Everyone, for temporary relief get a heavy duty vibrating massager. Mine works wonders when i have to get to sleep! At least something while we figure out long.term solutions...
"Hello, I thought as a fellow suffer in pain I would add my thoughts. I have a hernia hiatus which is caused by my fat belly. It causes acid to be pushed up into my esophagal at night, especially if I sleep in my right. This leaves the tube raw and swollen- but after some water /antacids I can get on with life. Now this brings me to my next set of symptoms. I recently had pneumonia and 3 lots of antibiotics - which has killed any good bacteria in my stomach as well. Found out this causes inflammation and pain in top rightish area of stomach- a lot of pain that no amount of antacids would relieve. So if I'm already raw from my hernia- this isn't going to help. So eating sauerkraut and bio yougurts and miso to build my good bacteria and bring g the inflammation down. Also took 1000mgof paracetamol to deal with pain ( hospital told me when I had pneumonia this was best way to take it- every 8hrs instead of 4- more effective). Also was taking ibuprofen for pneumonia - and it really hurts the lining of your stomach. Lastly I know that antacids and proton inhibitors actually back fire and make the body produce more acid after time, and also too low acid is bad as bacteria need it and we need it to properly digest. So when I lost weight a few months ago ( sadly put it back on) my acid reflux completely disappeared just like when I was younger and never has problems. These are my observations, take from them what you will.
"Hi jenny just reading all this after my attack with my stomach at 3am in the morning haha. Reading all what you say most of you have hit the nail on the head everytime i get in a car i feel sick and need a bathroom but it doesnt stop there it gets upset when i eat too i cant go 10 mins without needing a bathroom or feeling sick but i dont throw up its just diarrhea whats wrong with me i always cry i have to go to bathroom cause just cant hold on anxiety and pressure and i breathe like im pregnant i gained so much weight yet i eat close to nothing i eat one meal a day dinner thats it no fruit no tea nothing but that because im afraid to need the bathroom its devastating because o cant spend time with my husband. I was hoping a specialist would help but readin what you all said it sounds ill be waisting my time but i do need help but i wish and bless you well i wish us all well soon
"Thanks Terry. It sure does hurt especially when losing 30 pounds you didn't want to lose! I sure hope and pray again, that some one finds s cure for this type of pain! Well to the sergeon on Monday to see if he has any answers to which I doubt being that I have had all tests possible.
One drink I have been taking for last couple of months is a tumeric and almond milk drink. Because I have cut out tea I like a hot drink of a night. It has been really good in helping me up until this week. Almost like body gets immune to anything that helps after few months. So frustrating.
"Terry, sounds just like me! I am in my late 60 and it just hit me 4 mts go. Talk about tests, wow, I am drained of blood!! They have done everything possible except one right now, the colon test. I'm waiting on that one. For pain, and although they found no cancer, they put me on percocet, great to relieve pain. I lost 30 pounds in those months and little more. I hope one of these Doctors can find out what our problem is. I need a new stomach! Can they replace that??
I'm 33 year old male of small build and no other ilnesses.
My symptoms are symply feeling quite tender around middle of abdomen and also feeling quite sick. I can go few weeks with feeling quite good and very active but when it does hit me I really don't want to do much at all. I work shift work but keep my eating very simple now and quite plane. I like a beer but do not drink much and when I'm feeling good can have few beers without it changing this. I have cut out tea almost completely and only have one cup a day now. I have tried a lot of different midication, currently back on Lansoprazole in morning and amitriptylene before bed but like today feeling rather rubbish And so fed up with it ruining my life!!
"Hi Jenny. Hope this finds you feeling better? Just wondered if you ever got to the bottom of what was causing you to feel unwell? I have had very similar symptoms, and also mine has been on going for 3 years now!! I have had a number of cameras both endoscopy and colonoscopy I've had ultrasounds X-Ray's, blood tests urine and stool samples etc everything has come back pretty much fine slight inflammation here and there it nothing much. I have been under a specialist for the last year or two but again all results ok although did hear I have calcification on my prostate which I am seeing my GP about as this is not the area the specialist deals with.
"Hey Jenny! I see you posted this a year ago but I am curious to know if u are better or if they ever figured it out?! I've had the exact same thing u are describing for over 3 weeks now everyday and Drs and Gi has no clue what it is. It mind boggles me so I feel like I have to try and diagnosis myself Almost. Reading this discussion has actually made me feel a whole lot better knowing that I'm not alone but pain is awful and doesn't go away with flare ups as well. I've been taking tumeric and probiotics as well as kefir hoping it might help but so far nothing is working and they told me to not take Advil it Tylenol too but prescribed me oxy in which only covers it up. Anywhoo if ur still there and u get this I would love to know how you are coming along these days!!! Thank u and I do hope ur better
"i know this was listed a while ago but I hope you're still active. i have had the same problems except less frequent and no swelling of the stomach (at least, I had never checked). my stomach would hurt extremely bad and it took everything in me not to scream and then maybe an hour later I would just throw up so much. this happens very inconsistently and at the most random times.
go worse I just couldn't try to live with it anymore I went do stairs and cut up some cucumbers and put them in a boul and ate them I felt so much better after that so that leads of to right now when I am typing this down Evan though I have school in about 7 hours so Maybe it's just lack of greens ?
my name is Maddie and I'm a tween so you don't have to take me seriously is you don't want to but I want to tell you a story so here goes yesterday for brecfast I had mini muffens and swerly bread and for lunch I had pizza and then after that we went to a grad party and I didn't eat much because I had a big lunch ( of pizza ) and so after the party we got home and it was alredy past 7:00 so I had a Popsicle and went to be bed ""SNAP"" I woke up just like that at first I went to and don't get grossed out but I Tryed to go to the bathroom but I couldn't so I went back to my room with the comeing of time the pain just got worse I went to my moms room and told her how bad my stomach hurt and she said that it was propable because I didn't have any greens today and I was like OHHHH you are so right and she gave me some crackers and water and went back to bed I nibble on the crackers after that I tried to go to the bathroom 2 more times and nothing and it
"Hi...I am so thankful for all of the advice and chatting. My daughter who is just 16 is having this issue. She is adopted (has been here 2 years) and I do not want to run her through a bunch of tests. She has even been on the floor in tears in a ball position. She seems to wake up with pain gone and then it creeps on throughout the day. I am going to start logging her diet. I have been gluten free for 3 years and then I found out I couldn't tolerate dairy...so my diet changes has literally changed me. I hate that for a kid as I get it. I am very picky and eat like a kid....so just wanted to follow this chat line to get great tips. I am going to look into the alo vera as I know nothing about that. Thanks again for everyone's input and I am going to pray for those of you on here that are in pain.
Now i have had the same attack but no sickness i have been feeling sick though plus the other day i had bloody diarrhoea i have been four a ultra sound scan they say i have loads of little stones in my gallbladder also the other day i have had blood test done and doctors phone up to say come in a day early than my appointment is my partner is really worried would say its similar to yours many thanks
I have read your advert just wondering if I have a similar problem i had a problem with. vomting and stomach pains right across the bottom of my stomach and also my upper. abdomen on my right side and sometimes all over my stomach the pain hurts this happened the middle of march 2016 .
"Hey have you found out anything? I've been have stomach problems for 2 months now and I'm thinking it's my anxiety I have it bad
"Dear Jenny, I Have IBS & Acid Reflux for which I take Mebeverine & Omeprazole. I Had My ENT Appt Recently & I was Prescribed Lansoprazole by the ENT Consultant, to Try to Eleviate My Reflux Symptoms, So I Took it & the First Day My Stomach was Stinging, But I Thought, I Have to Give it a Chance as it Seemed to Help My Throat a Bit So for 1 Wk I Took it, But, the Lansoprazole Made My Pain & Symptoms 10 Times Worse, I wish I never used the Wretched Stuff. And Now I'm Scared to Eat Nearly Everything I Eat Disagrees with Me, I get Belly Burn which I Never had B4, Except Whilst Taking Ibuprofen, Which I Haven't Touched Since, But the Allergic Reaction I Got from That, Didn't, Last as Long as This! My Insides are Hyper Sensitive Since I Took it, it Should be Banned! I Shall be Returning to My GP Pronto to Ask for Some Kind of Ante Dote Reversal to These Awful Life Changing Symptoms. I Tried Drinking Lots of Milk Which Seemed to Help, But Sadly the Relieving Effect of the Milk was Only Temporary. I Feel Like Suing. As I'm Already Pretty Poorly, I've Got So Much Health Problems, I Could Write a Book. But with My Fybromyalgia, Vertigo, Goitre, Arthritis, Sciatica. None of These Are More Debilitating Than This, My Meds Keep Things Ticking Over Nicely, But This! I Eat Things Fine for Me for Years & End Up in Agony, Doubled Up in Pain with Either Diarrhoea or Constipation!!!
"Hi jenny33426, I am 16 years old and on the pill for various reasons, I have also been experiencing tummy pain for about 4 months now I have had blood tests and ultrasounds and been given A load of med's however none have worked and no one knows what it is, I have also been having serious back pain and my ribs have been hurting, so I'm not sure if this is anything like yours or you know what this is?
"Jenny, I know it has been a while since you posted this information, and hopefully you have found a soultion. My mother has been going through this very thing for the past two years. What we FINALLY found is that the blood vessels that are supplying blood to her stomach were colluded. Out of three major vessels that supply the stomach, one is completely closed and the other two were very diseased. They placed a stent in the major vessel. Since my mother is elderly, they want to do the second one in a few months. THE RESULTS were miraculous! She can now eat and does not have ANY pain. I hope this is something that you haven't had checked and they can do the contrast CT and MRA (artery) to find the results for your own stomach. Best of luck!
I currently have the exact same symptoms and basically went through the exact same experience (as far as going to the hospital and having all my tesr results be perfectly fine) as you. I know it has been years since this post but I really hope you or someone who's been in the same position can help because I desperately need help. I've been experiencing this pain for about a month and now I'm scared on the daily bases that I'll forever feep this way. So if you or anyone reading this have overcome their gastritis, please share with me how you did so.
I have severe upper abdominal pain everyday, from coughing to sneezing any sudden movement gives me pain. I can only describe it as if there is a vice twisting and turning inside. I lost my appetite for a while and as a result ended up losing a stone in weight, this added to my depression and anxiety as I hate the way I look now, I'm basically 8st and feel so unattractive at the moment. But anyway my appetite is slowly coming back, but I also get feelings of sickness out the blue, and sometimes I am sick, and is known as bile, a yellow coloured fluid. So I went back to my doctor and he referred me to get an endoscopy which showed I have inflammation in the stomach, and the hpylori virus (I think that's how you spell it) I find out next Friday. They also took 4 biopsies which I'll find the results for that in 4 weeks time. I'm hoping and praying it comes back ok. We know when our bodies are not right, keep on pushing your doctor for the endoscopy, don't just keep taking the tablets, that could just be prolonging the problem. Good luck x
I've been dealing with this pain also for way over a year a now. My doctor started me off on lanzoprazole for a few months the he put me on omeprazol, neither have helped with my symptoms or pain.
I have severe upper abdominal pain everyday, from coughing to sneezing any sudden movement gives me pain. I can only describe it as if there is a vice twisting and turning inside. I lost my appetite for a while and as a result ended up losing a stone in weight, this added to my depression and anxiety as I hate the way I look now, I'm basically 8st and feel so unattractive at the moment. But anyway my appetite is slowly coming back, but I also get feelings of sickness out the blue, and sometimes I am sick, and is known as bile, a yellow coloured fluid. So I went back to my doctor and he referred me to get an endosc
I've been dealing with this pain also for way over a year a now. My doctor started me off on lanzoprazole for a few months the he put me on omeprazol, neither have helped with my symptoms or pain.
"Glad to know I'm not the only one with these same stomach issues. I'm 34 now and I've had all these symptoms since I was about 3 or 4 years old and no one has been able to figure out what the cause is or how to help me. Up until 2 years ago the flares of pain (like razor blades swimming in my stomach) and the constant nausea would happen maybe once a month but since then it's almost every day. The worst episode i had lasted a full month and was even causing me so much dizziness from the pain that i was always on the verge of passing out and still they can't find a cause. Going next week for another gastroscope to see if anything new has come up but I doubt it. I am going to look into the Aloe Vera, L-glutamine and Acidophilus Plus that some others on here mentioned and hopefully those can provide a bit of relief cause at this point I can barelly function.
"having the same problems in the usa ugh been through it all a Gastroscopy and colonoscopy nothing showing anyrthings wrong was eeling better than bamm pain back not sure why maybe the smoking idk but man the pain hurts got a doctors apointment wed will see but like you i going through the same bs with every doctor telling me to deal with it theres nothing you can do stop smoking drink just water take pills no pain killers blan diet yoga my problem is its in the same fing spot
"i had laporoscopy mine hurt like hell felt like someone was stabbing me with a knife
Please look into having a laporoscopy as Endometriosis effects thousands of women every day. It is such a strange and varied disease and at present takes a minimum of 8 years to diagnose. All of my examinations except the laporoscopy came back clear and normal. If what I have was classed as MILD Endometriosis I would hate to feel what severe feels like.
They found what they described as MILD Endometriosis. And removed it with lasers. It will come back but my symptoms have not completely gone but have improved 90% and I am able to work out which foods to avoid at which times.
Something in me was telling me that this is what I had. The only test that I hadn't had which is the was they find it for definite. Was something called a laporoscopy. This is where they make small incisions in your abdomen and go in with a camera. After months of fighting the doctors who would not except that I wanted a laporoscopy because my symptoms did not match I finally with the help of my GP got my way and went in for a laporoscopy.
I started researching it but the general symptoms didn't match mine. The only thing I noticed was that my stomach tended to be at its worst when I was fertile and around my periods.
Last year I finally had enough. My friend had completely different symptoms to me but had recently been diagnosed with something called Endometriosis. (The lining of the womb grows outside of the womb on other organs)
I took loads of different prescribed and over the counter Meds over the years nothing touched it.
I paid to have colonic hydrotherapy didn't do anything.
Blood tests - normal and clear for years but eventually developed B12 deficiency which I now receive 3 monthly injections for but didn't stop my issues.
After 15 years of suffering with your symptoms and being palmed off with IBM over and over I feel your pain. I had the following tests
"I am having the same stomach problem and found this thred while searching for a reason of my stomach ache. The pain comes atleast once in a week and it is so severe. This thread is now older than one year so i am eager to know if somebody found any solution for this.
I went to many doctors I found out I am LACTOSE INTOLERANT, as soon as I stopped lactose products the misrable pain stopped I hope this helps others with this, I spent years in pain make sure you don't have food intolerances
"I made an account just to write my story I hope it helps others I looked for years for relief on forums and finally found the problem, I suffered daily with bad stomach pains mainly just above the belly button the pains was daily and constant most times I couldn't sleep the pain was so bad I thought I had an ulcer, the only thing that helped was mylanta,
"hi, i too suffer with this pain to the point im on my hands and knees,last year i had the anti biotics for the infection which seem to clear it but for passed few months has come back with avengence,im currently on lansaprozole but it as ni effect,im to the point where i dont want to eat as the pain worsens after food im at my wits end awaiting more gp appointments
"A couple days ago I was searching online about gastritis medication and how long it takes to work. I was researching this for my mother who has been experiencing the same symptoms that you and many others on this thread have been experiencing. My mother too had tests done, blood tests urine tests ect...when we were at the hospital, doctors couldn't figure out what could be causing the pain, she was given every drug the hospital had and the only one that took the pain away was morphine, in exchange for the pain subsiding, she was throwing up excessively from the morphine. My mother suggested it might be gastritis, so they sent her home with a prescription of Prilosec, with hope this would relieve all this pain she's been in. 3 days later, with the pain not subsiding or getting better we went to another hospital and waited 7 hours to be seen by a doctor. She had more tests done including a ct scan and luckily we had an answer to all her suffering. It was a swollen pancreas due to a stone blocking her pancreas. Apparently gall stones can still form even without a gall bladder. (My mom had hers removed several years ago) eating food brings on more pain because the stone is lodged in the way of food passing through. I hope my post may help someone. I literally read every post on this thread and felt for everyone of you, as soon as we found an answer I immediately thought about coming on here and posting about it. Take care All!
I'm fighting through it but taking IBS tablets and having colonics but nothing helps
I'm having a very similar pain.
i have even done endoscopy two times during the last year, I'm still in pain all day and night, , ,I don't know what causing it, now I have been given drug for anti depression, ofcourse if I be in pain for this long I will get depressed,,,. I am going to try it anyways, maybe I am depressed and I don't know myself and that's all into it. I really can't find answer for this pain.
"It's very frustrating, I have done all sort of test, and doctors can't really help.
"Hi Jenny, I am glad you started this discussion. It seems many have the same symptoms. I have it too, all of it, the pain, sometimes nauzea, at times feels like a bruised stomach, pain got so intense once I thought I was having a heart attack. I have had many tests as well. Many medications have been tried and not succeeded. It seems the Aloe Vera is the most common treatment among all here, I will try it. Anything is worth a try. I too am tired of the pain. I have lost much weight (45 lbs.) without trying and am still losing. I have other medical problems including ulcerative colitis and asthma and arthritis. I am 54. Perhaps there were no recent responses but I am wondering how you are doing now? Have you found anything that works? Warm water seems to work for a short period of time, relieves the pain. Nothing else works except, of course, not eating. Any food (although I eat very little and nothing to irritate stomach) still hurts my stomach. The Dr's are not God and obviously do their best but sometimes do not find answers. These conversations are good, perhaps we can learn from one another. I live in Canada. How are things going for everyone now?
"You may want to have your gal bladder checked. I recently (3mths ago) had severe pains in my stomach which was unbearable. A lot of the time it would come about at night when trying to sleep. Or even eating or drinking anything. I always ended up vomiting from the pain.But I finally went to the E.R. one night and they ran a CT/CAT scan on my stomach. My gal bladder was severely twice the size it should have been. I HAD GAL STONES!! It was making my liver sick as well and I was turning yellowish,like jondice.Thankfully I have no more worries after undergoing surgery to remove my gal bladder and all the stones.I am happy to say I have no more pain. ..hope this helps you all in any way. God Bless!
"Wow I have had these symptoms since summer 2013...I am a senior in college now and I can barely function in school because I am up half the night with excruciating stomach pain that makes me throw up usually in the early morning-4-5 am. I have tried EVERYTHING from prescribed medications, lifestyle changes ((((FODMAPS made it worse, and it seems only carbs help)))))), and homeopathic remedies-none of which have helped. I do not smoke, hardly drink, and have been doing yoga for years and meditating, nothing puts it to ease. I am in result completely exhausted, mentally and physically, and extremely frustrated that I cannot find the answer. I have been diagnosed with many things including IBS, gastrotitis, inflammation, etc etc etc. These are all ways of doctors saying ""i dont know"". Hopefully someone soon can help us....
"I know this is an old post but I've been going thru these symptoms for over a year now. I have bouts of pain after eating, drinking and at times when my stomach is empty....so pretty much constant. I have been diagnosed with ulcerative colitis whic is under control and gastritis, gerd, and small hiatal hernia. My doctor said the hernia shouldn't be causing the problem so that leaves me with the gerd and gastritis. I am taking a high dose of Prilosec ttwice a day and Carafate.i don't drink, smoke, or eat acidic or spicy food. The only things I drink are water or almond milk.i don't know what else to do. I know that for me coffee, chocolate, and peppermint ate definite no-nos. right now I am havivivg pretty bad pains but I'm hoping the Carafate stops it. It usually takes about a week for it to kick in. My doctor wants me to take all that is basically Prilosec with bicarbonate added. They are expensive so I may try to just add a little bicarbonate soda when I take my Prilosec. When having the pain, the only thing I can eat is plain rice, baked chicken, and white potatoes. Stomach still has pain but could be worse. My gall bladder was removed 2 years ago and I believe my problem may be from bile in my stomach and not just regular acid. I will probably call my doc in a few days. He told me if it didn't get better he wanted to do a CAT scan. Not sure why as I think another endoscopy is what I need. I may try aloe juice. Will repost if I do.
"Hi my names michael haigh im 39 years old..3 weeks ago i started getting really bad stomach pain...so went to the docs...she guessed at gastritis...and told me to keep taking omeprazole which dident have any affect..and the pain worsend to the point i went to a&e...they did all blood tests...urine sampel and a few other tests that all came back clear...they arranged for an appointment for me to have the camera down my throat and a scan..which im worried about having...scared to death if im honest of the outcome...im still waiting for these tests and recently visited my doc again as im now feeling ill and still got pain that will not go...did you ever get over this problem..and can anyone give me any idea what this could be..or a way to relieve feeling like this? Xxx
I take tecta on a daily basis.
When I dont eat I feel sick. ..when I do eat I feel sick....no matter what it's an issue. ....
I too am experiencing the same symptoms unfortunately.....however I do suffer from extreme anxiety and panic attacks. I have been on and off antidepressants over the past 15 years.....I refuse to go on them as I believe they are making my conditions worse. They cause alot of gastrointestinal issues....
I too am experiencing the same symptoms unfortunately.....however I do suffer from extreme anxiety and panic attacks. I have been on and off antidepressants over the past 15 years.....I refuse to go on them as I believe they are making my conditions worse. They cause alot of gastrointestinal issues....
Anyway, this is my little story about stomach pains, I feel what you feel, and I really hope that your pain will go away very soon because it's not something you can live with forever...
I'm amazed reading you, its as if i had written it myself!
Could not believe, how similar symptoms are. I have dealt with it since twenties. Now i'm 60. It has gotten worse with years. The only thing that does help me is a very strong and expensive probiotic pill which I take every morning.
I have also gained weight that its hard to get rid off. Its a negative circle, since the more wait you gain and the more sick you become, the more tired and less energy to exercise you are.
i have been diagnosed w: IBS, lactose intolerance, etc, etc. but no treatment has been successful.
I know it's been quite some time since you posted this, but as my (actually my husband's) issue is more current, I thought I'd take the chance and see if you're still around and posting.
I cannot believe how identical your stomach aches are to mine. Word for word it could have been written by me.
My husband (read above.post) is so discouraged over this whole thing and I can't really blame him. But I keep making him try, I know there's a solution out there somewhere. From reading this thread, it seems like with so many people with these issues, the gastroenterology field.would be working a little harder with us all. Oh well.
Hello I found your post on your husbands stomach pain while one of my desperately attempts to get to the bottom of my own stomach issues through the Internet anyways he sounds like he's did suffering from turbo same exact thing Iam even down to the appendix and c diff bug I realize that this post is older but I was curious if he has gotten any better if you found help or a diagnosis?? I'm a 30 year old mother of two and I'm sad to say that some days I don't want to be here because of this stomach pain I just want some answers and a doctor who will do the work to find out what's wrong! Thank you so much for your time!
I wondered if anyone could help me, since about January 2013 I have on and off had a dull ache in my stomach, sometimes flaring up to make me feel sick. I actually put this down to anxiety however in the past few weeks my theory has changed.
About three weeks ago my stomach flared up however to the worst pain I have experienced as yet, made me feel like I was going to be sick constantly and made me not know what to do with myself. I feel like there is a lump in my thought and my stomach feels tender and swollen when flares up feels like my stomach is on fire/knotted up!
The pain was so sever I went to the doctors (2 and a half weeks ago), my doctor felt my stomach and said it felt swollen, I told her the symtoms and she says she thinks I have gastritis and prescribed me with Lansoprazole 30mg tablets to take daily for 1 month, this however to date hasn't helped my stomach at all, the flare up comes and goes however the pain in my stomach is constant and the Lansorprazole is causing terrible upset stomach to the point I am worried to not be near a toilet.
I went back to the doctors on Tuesday 22/10 explained all of the above to her and she said I am to keep taking the tablets and she is happy to see me again in November
Has anyone experienced symptoms same as above as I feel extremely on my own shouting and no one understanding what im going though
It's amazing to read that I am not the only one who is struggling with daily stomach pains. I feel so bad for each and every one of you because I know how terrible and frustrating it is to be in pain every day and not be able to figure out why it's happening.
I am 28 years old, I don't smoke, I don't drink, I don't drink coffee or soda, I eat healthy and only drink water, I am not overweight either. I should not be having such problems and yet I am in pain more days than I am not. I have noticed that my stomach started to get upset in 2007 when I started to drink coffee more regularly, but it wasn't nearly as bad as it is now....almost 7 years later (I don't drink cofee anymore though). I have cut out so many foods already out of my diet and already eat very basic foods such as rice and chicken
I feel like I am at the point where I do not care what I have to do in order to feel better. I have no other health issues. When my stomach doesn't hurt, I feel great! Such a difference! But when it does, I have no energy, my stomach is bloated and I don't feel like doing anything, I feel disgusting and in pain. I don't care if I have to get a surgery or stop eating bread or dairy, whatever I need to do! This may sound terrible and of course I would never do it, but sometimes I feel like I just want to stab myself in the stomach because I'm just so tired of dealing with this every single day of my life and there's no one that can help me. Every time I call to make an appointment with my GI, he's always booked and I have to wait a months...how much longer will this go on!?
I am sorry about the rant, I'm sure you can sense how frustrated I am with this, as I'm sure you are as well. I really hope that we could be fixed so that we could go on having happy and healthy lives with no pain (I can't imagine what that will be like! It's been so long since I felt good). Let's keep our fingers crossed. I will run by my doctors some of the suggestions that I read on here..such as aloe vera and acidophilus, we'll see what she says.
Your stomach problems sound a lot like mine, I don't know what to do and I have been dealing with this for so long my anxiety has picked up about it and the doctor is running out of options let me know if you have found some relief. Not only to let my doctor know but just so I know there is a light at the end of the tunnel
Hi I know this post his old but I cannot believe how similar thoughts I have at this moment in time. I had terrible pains 3 or so years ago for months on end. I was so down. I then found one probiotic in the morning and aloe Vera at night worked wonders and my bought severely reduced to about once a quarter and the longest being 2 weeks. That was however until 5 weeks ago when I had a sudden flare for no reason. I too just want to stab my stomach and see what's going on. It may go off for an hour and I'm totally different and positive. It's like a light switch. I'm now getting very depressed and emotional (I'm a 44 year old man!) and it's starting to affect my family as I'm very irritable. I just hope I can get back to how I was but I'm not helping with getting stressed. Going back to Dr's as feel this cannot just be IBS. Hope you got sorted.
Just to let you know, i am yet to make any progress as yet, after 2 months of waiting my consultation with the stomach specialist is finally tomorrow morning! It can't come quick enough!
Nothing has changed with me if I am honest, i have been keeping a food diary (nothing is standing out that could be causing my stomach problems can happen one week but not the next if i have eaten the same things). I have been taking my spoon full of Onken Natural yogurt 3 x a day for over a month now, I have also been drinking 2 x peppermint tea a day too (apparently good for your digestive system) unfortunately still not cured.
Every day that goes by I am just getting used to the fact that this is going to be with me forever, it makes me miserable and things that i should enjoy aren't enjoyable, I had my friends wedding for example last Friday, Thursday my stomach flared up terribly again ALL DAY! luckily it went down by Friday however i was sitting on the edge of my seat all day worrying it was going to flare again .
its interesting how you say that your husband got these sympthoms after getting ill on holiday as that is exactly what happened to me! I went on holiday September 2012 got really ill (extrememly bad diorea for 24+ hours) ever since this holiday my problems started, intermitantly at first till October last year where i have it every day!
I am lucky that i am strong minder and no matter what i power through and live my every day life, I continue to go to work with the pain and out with friends, however some days its torture but I am determind not to let this get the better of me!
my husband was back at hospital this morning and has come away feeling a bit more optimistic. he saw a different consultant who is doing some more blood tests and stool samples. He said that he will check again for the h.pylori bacteria as despite my husband having already taken two courses of the treatment for the bacteria following his illness on holiday in Feb 2013, some forms of it can be resistant to particular antibiotics. He is also going to get his Gp to prescribe some different medications so I will keep you posted. He mentioned as well that there is a part of the stomach which still cannot be seen from either an endoscopy or a colonoscopy so he is looking into this as well.
I will keep you posted how I get on tomorrow
My name is leticia and I started having stomach pain and I thought it was because of my back diet. Because I don't eat very much and it's the pain it's right in the middle of my stomach and it goes to my shoulder blades. And I also have fibromyalgia and that doesn't help but I can't take the pain anymore it hurts so bad in the makes me throw up sometimes especially if I eat something. I don't like to eat so it makes it harder on me and I'm getting scared because this is the first time I'm reading that a lot of women and men have the same problem. I feel your pain because my pain makes me cry😪 I haven't gone to the doctor for the stomach pain I'm scared he's going to tell me I have something bad and then I feel like I did it to myself for trying to being a crazy diet! I'm 50 years old and sometimes I feel like I'm definitely not going to wake up. I just can't believe all the people that have the stomach pain just like mine I thought I was in makes me feel good reading and trying to find an answer!I pray you're doing better and you don't have the pain no more hopefully they fixed two maybe you could give me the answer? You friend Lettie Davis Cali
I've no idea if you're still using this site but I'm in the exact same boat as you.
I've just been diagnosed with chronic gastritis , H pylori negative, no vomiting or passing blood, the PPI's I've been put on seem to aggravate my stomach.
My stomach is incredibly inflamed, I'm beside myself with pain and can only take water and extremely plain food at the moment.
On Friday 25/04 - had an appt with my stomach specialist, explained that i am still getting upset stomach every morning, occassional bouts of my stomach bloating excessively (once a month or so) and the odd days weekly that i just generally don't feel well.
Even though i have already had the Endoscope and Colonoscope this goes through your small intestines to see if there is any kind of disease there (the others can't go through your small intestines.
I found your post very interesting. I too have been suffering from the exact same symptoms you have. It's been going on for nearly a year and so far the docs are no help.
About 2 weeks ago I had enough and took myself to emergency. They did an ultrasound and said everything looked fine over than the fact that I have gallstones. The doctor said however that my symptoms are not likely caused by that and that I probably have an ulcer. She prescribed me Pantoloc and said to keep taking it 2x a day until I feel better. Then stop, see if the symptoms return, go do the breathe test for h.pylori and we'll go from there. Ugh.
I really didn't feel great about her ""diagnoses"" so I went to see my family doc. He suggested that it's the gallstones and that I should see a surgeon. He put in a refferal for me but says it could take months to get in. Not to mention that I'm not sure my symptoms match that of gallstones. Sigh.
Im so lost. This is really ruining my quality of life. I hate living in pain and I have no clue what to do about it.
No I have tried aloe yet to be honest, at the moment I am not taking any medication, and my stomach just goes in waves of feeling ok and then bad other days! I just take each day as it comes until my next appt for the capsule camera.
I have had the same problem now for over a couple years. I have had my esophagus stretched 3 times and not helped. The only think that releives the pain is drinking down a bottle of water until the pain is gone. I have problems and unable to burp making the pain even more unbearable. I have been under a lot of stress in the last well all my life. I am happier now but as I was growing up, if I got stressed out, my stomach would knot up and I couldn't eat. Anyway I have had the burium swallow and all that but I think I am going to go see a chiropractor. I know my neck is out and well, it wouldn't hurt to see if that could help.
i read recently that piched nerves in neck or back can cause excess acid to be released into stomach causing ulcer type problems, my neck is out right now and am having real trouble with my stomach
I wondered if anyone could help me, since about January 2013 I have on and off had a dull ache in my stomach, sometimes flaring up to make me feel sick. I actually put this down to anxiety however in the past few weeks my theory has changed.
About three weeks ago my stomach flared up however to the worst pain I have experienced as yet, made me feel like I was going to be sick constantly and made me not know what to do with myself. I feel like there is a lump in my thought and my stomach feels tender and swollen when flares up feels like my stomach is on fire/knotted up!
The pain was so sever I went to the doctors (2 and a half weeks ago), my doctor felt my stomach and said it felt swollen, I told her the symtoms and she says she thinks I have gastritis and prescribed me with Lansoprazole 30mg tablets to take daily for 1 month, this however to date hasn't helped my stomach at all, the flare up comes and goes however the pain in my stomach is constant and the Lansorprazole is causing terrible upset stomach to the point I am worried to not be near a toilet.
I went back to the doctors on Tuesday 22/10 explained all of the above to her and she said I am to keep taking the tablets and she is happy to see me again in November (once the months course has been taking) however im in dispear with this pain HAD ENOUGH OF FEELING ILL and can't help but think the worse
Has anyone experienced symptoms same as above as I feel extremely on my own shouting and no one understanding what im going though
It sure isn't pleasant as I have recently experienced something similar but not all the symptoms everyone's mentioned.
A couple of weeks ago, I had not eaten for a couple of days due to work and laziness and the only thing i had was a manky mango that afternoon. That night the stomach started to get uncomfortable and remained the same the next day. The next two nights was unbearable pains from ribs to waist, all over. Bloated, nausea, pain, farting (sorry passing wind), for the first week. Attended the doctors 3 times that week, to be told food poisoning to trapped wind. I am a bad eater, so I started to have 3 meals a day, then i had an ultra scan, I had been given pain killers to digestion tablets, to bacteria killing tablets, allsorts. Nothing was working not even the injection to kill instant pain.
I had mentioned before that my sister had intestine problems and they have only left her with 10% intestine, in her stomach, but after my scan I brought up the fact that she was born with organs in the wrong place. That is when they then realised that my pancreas is above my stomach and not below.
Now I am awaiting their next advice, as they wanted to go through the scans again. My pains have gone, and maybe i am thinking it was a bactrial virus, that took it's time getting out
same problems recently found out that I have food intolarences check the above link as its really helped.
four years on from taking lazoperazole for acid reflux I find out through my own research that lanzoperaloze is not that good for us ,, we need acid in our stomachs but lanzoperaloze not only reducing the stomach making acid it also stops vital vitamins and minerals from entering the body just like a sponge..
im currently on a seclusion diet basically preteen shakes and I introduce certain foods and keep a diary and I have to be honest wheat makes me really I'll gluten makes me I'll msg in Chinese food and certain fruit and veg.
i have lost two stone but what I have found out really helps me build a benchmark, for years I have dealt with stress ( food related I now believe) I also have panick attacks and feel like I'm choking on food so if it does not digest I'm usually sick..
ive had a long list of symptoms including fatigue sickness stress dizziness foggy brain generally run down and I'm putting this all down to what my body accepts or does not accept as its fuel..
Yes I get acid reflux but only from certain foods also I have intolarences .
im on the same boat , but all my problems start after a broadspectrum antibiotics , cipro and levoquin . is i lot better now but , scary , atill have stomach problems after 8 months and some anxiety
I have also been feeling ill and trouble with bowels and stomach fullness. It's been a month and a half and driving me insane.
Thank you for messaging, I have been tested for coeliac disease which came back negative.
Thank you very much for your reply. Please tell me if you have ever come across this. My problem began after I had eaten some raw garlic, I was totally fine before that.
Then bam my stomach was in constant agony which just went on and on. I was treated for stomach ulcer and after a few months was better. But then it was iffy here and there and bam. It went again when I had some probiotics.
I do not have stress, the only thing I am stressed about is this.
i have the same simptoms try and read about natural cure like cabbage juice ,DGL , ALOE VERA and PROBIOTICS
I wondered if anyone could help me, since about January 2013 I have on and off had a dull ache in my stomach, sometimes flaring up to make me feel sick. I actually put this down to anxiety however in the past few weeks my theory has changed.
About three weeks ago my stomach flared up however to the worst pain I have experienced as yet, made me feel like I was going to be sick constantly and made me not know what to do with myself. I feel like there is a lump in my thought and my stomach feels tender and swollen when flares up feels like my stomach is on fire/knotted up!
The pain was so sever I went to the doctors (2 and a half weeks ago), my doctor felt my stomach and said it felt swollen, I told her the symtoms and she says she thinks I have gastritis and prescribed me with Lansoprazole 30mg tablets to take daily for 1 month, this however to date hasn't helped my stomach at all, the flare up comes and goes however the pain in my stomach is constant and the Lansorprazole is causing terrible upset stomach to the point I am worried to not be near a toilet.
I went back to the doctors on Tuesday 22/10 explained all of the above to her and she said I am to keep taking the tablets and she is happy to see me again in November (once the months course has been taking) however im in dispear with this pain HAD ENOUGH OF FEELING ILL and can't help but think the worse
Has anyone experienced symptoms same as above as I feel extremely on my own shouting and no one understanding what im going though
I am in a very similar situatino to what you were saying here, it would be good to talik.
I've experienced basically same thing after getting permanent diabetes after having it w all 3 of my boys! I started with really bad stomach pains so bad that I was doubled over and went to the ER for the first time many years ago.I was told that I had good news and bad news one that was diabetic n 2 I have really bad gastritis! which is usually activated they said when my sugar is really high over 300 which it does all the times it also drops really low and I'm hypoglycemic also.I spent almost seven have eight years in gymnastics for about 8 hours a day. I've and got hit by a car back in 2001actually it was a 4x4 truck Toyota 4runnerwith a big,black grade steel guard on the front. so the only thing I suggest is that you can go to a pain clinic.They are the only one I can write you pain medicine for what you're going through.a doctor can only write so many prescriptions for pain before the have to send you to a pain clinic.it seems you have insurance I do too through Ford Motor Company so I don't know how different it would be for you to go but 13 years ago it was hard to find one there is only two in my state now they're like Starbucks, thier on every corner!
I have gone through the exact problems you have. I was diagnosed with IBS. I went through the ultrasound and endoscopy also everything came back normal.
I thought I'd let you know what has helped me. I stopped drinking pop. I went to juice that doesnt have much sugar in it, water and tea. I know everyone is different. It could be worth a shot though.
I hope you feel better soon. I hated not knowing what was happening to my body. The pain was unbearable and all I could do was cry. I was always afraid that I would get sick of I left the house. It controlled my life terribly bad. Ever since I stopped drinking pop I go out without having to worry! My doctors here in the US put me on a GI relaxer called rubnil (not sure if I spelt it right.) Let me know what you find out maybe it could help me also!
Basically to let you know where i am now with it all I decided I couldn't go through with the Capsule Camera at the moment so have come away from seeing doctors etc for the time being as to be honest I felt as if I was going around in circles and thought i would keep a ANOTHER diary and see if i notice any patterns myself.
Thankfully I am currently not getting the horrific sypthoms i was getting on a daily basis (diroea, horrific swollen stomach and feeling sick) however now I am getting it a couple of times a week which generally lasts 2 - 3 days depending on how bad it is.
Last time I went to see my GP he just said ""its IBS"" however I found hard to accept such a flippent diagnosis considering IBS is undiagnosable?
It was almost everyday I was getting sick and would last 2-3 days at a time feel better one day then I'd get sick again. It is definitely worth a shot! let me know if it helps you!
How intersting, yes as you say pretty much the same as me!
For the past 2 months I have been in complete agony with stomach pains. I have been to the ER a number of times and they have done blood work and ultra sounds and have came up with nothing.
I forgot to list another one of my symptoms, I have low back pain which also radiates into my thighs. Ughhhh. Again any help would be appreciated so much!!!!
3 years later (I know) but I have bloated sore stomach all the times. Tired of the pain and fear of eating and feeling malnourished.
i had the same pain and i cried majority of the night i couldnt sleep or hang out with friends i went to the doctor they didnt know what was going on i went to a GYN and they started me on birth control thinking it was cramps but the pain was still there finally i went to the emergency room when the pain was at its peek and the gave me medecine i stopped taking it for a while and the pain just dissappeard and then not too long ago about a week ago it came back and i already stopped eating me and drinking dairy i went gluten free for awhile and im still in a constant pain even if its minimal it still hurt i drink only water and hot tea and its really unbearable sometimes. have you figured out what it is yet ?
I was having burning pains in my upper abdomen daily, I also excessively burped and had LPR (silent reflux). I couldn't prevent these symptoms and they were so persistent I genuinely thought I was dying of stomach cancer for months and I thought nobody was taking me seriously and that I was going to be dead within the year. Googling your symptoms is some scary stuff. I think the stress itself is what made it worse. Now the symptoms will only appear if I drink alcohol or fizzy drinks. I still had to avoid many spicy types of food too which sucks I guess but anything is better than cancer
i was told i had lazy bowel abour 18month ago,told to eat lots of fibre everything calmed down,but about 3wks ago i would wake up in a morning with pain in the left side of my tummy,it would go after about 3 mins,but now its all day long all over my tummy and i feel sick,i think the worry is worse than the syptom going to ring docs for appoint in morning,but very worried.hope you have sorted your problem out
So sorry your going through something so smiliar to my problem. I thought I was the only one. Our sysmptoms are so similiar expect that my stomach is so huge and my weight is going crazy. One day I have a perfect regular flat stomach and suddenly I start swelling I go super huge people even ask me if im pregnant. My stomach gets supper huge, hard, and heavy. Ive had numerous of tests done like; upper endoscopys, colonoscpopys, thousands of blood tests, collected urine to have it tested, numerous of cts scans, ultrasounds, and xrays. Weve pretty much have done everything in the book. Im close to almost 3 months with this condition now. Its super diffucult to sleep, eat and sometimes even breath. I havent worked in a long time now due to all of these sysmptoms. None of the hydrocodine pills work any more. They first diagnosed me with IBS but none of the treatments worked for me. Ive done these crazy diets where I cant eat anything and only drink water and my stomach still seems to get bigger. I can't fit in any of my clothes. I feel like i'm going insane with all of these tests results being completly normal. Have you gotten any better? Any results?
So glad your finally getting some relief. Ive pretty much have tried everything and nothing seems to work I only get worse. I have an upcoming MRI and i'm hoping we could finally find an answer.
I have been suffering from the same symptoms for about 3 weeks now. Doctors have taken blood and stool samples and everything has come back as normal. Every morning my body wakes me up at around 8-9 and I am very ill for about 3-4 hours and then I am back to my normal self. The pain is very excruciating and I am more just annoyed that i havent slept in past 8 for 3 weeks. Doctors have ruled out a couple things, they say it could be IBS but i dont meet all the symptoms that IBS sufferers have. Anyways I was just woundering if you have heard anything new as of late. By the way I am 17 years old and this condition is ruining my social life and making me very depressed. I just wish there was somthing that i could do to make it go away
I have a 17yo daughter whonsuffers daily from nausea and stomach pain. She is afraid to eat anything and has lost alot of weight. She has had an upper gi and lower gi test and both are fine. Ahe was hospitalized for a week with extensive testing and all came back normal. She has seem a GI doctor and meds make her sick. She skips social gatherings and school ALOT! HAVE YOU FOUND ANY RELIEF? Any help would help. So worried.
I'm 20 years old and was suffering with exactly what you have described for more than 13 months, trying various medications, etc, before realising that I have had anxiety for a number of years, and it is what causer my stomach problems (crazy, I know). It turned into a vicious cycle because I (just like your daughter) was so afraid to eat anything in case it made me feel sick and in turn that made the anxiety worse, and so on. Although this might be a special case, maybe you should ask your daughter about this, because I was told that its more common than you would think . a few days after realising the cause, and after going to a councikker, I learned that deep breathing is a major help, and in the last 2 weeks my appetite is back to normal and my stomach is much more settled. I'm not 100% better but its getting there! I really hope this helps because I truely feel her pain, it was a nightmare.
I've had similar problems for the past 4 years. I've been to so many doctors and no one knows what's wrong with me and all the tests would come back negative. For me I had a lot of acid reflux where it would go to my chest throat and ears. It was constant 24/7 and many days because of it I cannot go to sleep. I have quit working because I just can't function with the pain and the sleepless nights. Eventually a doctor diagnosed me with gastroparesis which is the food not clearing fast enough from your stomach to your intestine therefore it could cause a plethora of problems. However I don't think that is what is causing all of my pain. The only thing that I really helped me was magnesium supplements. When I take it my body is just calm but it also caused soo much side effects that I just cannot be on it. I think my real problem is that my stomach muscles are in constant spasm. Recently my doctor prescribed a calcium channel blocker and that also seem to help, they are suppose to dialate the blood vessels so that your muscles can relax usually prescribed for people who have high blood pressure.
I started having this problem in my late 20s and because I look young and healthy, no one took me seriously, the only thing they ever related my problem to would be an eating disorder which I've never had! I am Asian and naturally thin and since I have had the stomach problems I've lost about another 10 pounds (I normally weigh 107 and I am 5'7) so that's a lot of weight to loose. And of course after hearing that all the specialist would again bring up anorexia as a potential cause.
I've literally tried pretty much everything, from aloe to zinc l-carnosine etc etc and by trial and error found that my problem has to be related to smooth muscle spasms and perhaps with neurotransmitters and hormones that are regulating the actions of the stomach.
I found this thread while trying to figure out what is wrong with my 10 year old son. He has had similar stomach issues for almost 3 weeks now. It seems to always be bad in the morning and evening, we have been eating healthier but that hasn't changed much for his stomach issues. We have been to the doctor and had a bunch of tests run and everything is coming back clear. Did you ever figure out what was causing your issues? I am inclined to get him some Acidophilus supplements since that seemed to help a few people on here.
One common cause to these syptoms could be H.Pylori ask the doc to test him for that - its a simple stool sample they send away - easy to test for and least you can rule that out straight away.
I wondered if anyone could help me, since about January 2013 I have on and off had a dull ache in my stomach, sometimes flaring up to make me feel sick. I actually put this down to anxiety however in the past few weeks my theory has changed.
About three weeks ago my stomach flared up however to the worst pain I have experienced as yet, made me feel like I was going to be sick constantly and made me not know what to do with myself. I feel like there is a lump in my thought and my stomach feels tender and swollen when flares up feels like my stomach is on fire/knotted up!
The pain was so sever I went to the doctors (2 and a half weeks ago), my doctor felt my stomach and said it felt swollen, I told her the symtoms and she says she thinks I have gastritis and prescribed me with Lansoprazole 30mg tablets to take daily for 1 month, this however to date hasn't helped my stomach at all, the flare up comes and goes however the pain in my stomach is constant and the Lansorprazole is causing terrible upset stomach to the point I am worried to not be near a toilet.
I went back to the doctors on Tuesday 22/10 explained all of the above to her and she said I am to keep taking the tablets and she is happy to see me again in November (once the months course has been taking) however im in dispear with this pain HAD ENOUGH OF FEELING ILL and can't help but think the worse
Has anyone experienced symptoms same as above as I feel extremely on my own shouting and no one understanding what im going though
"Thanku so much for your reply, however I was tested for h pylori virus two weeks ago my results came back last Friday saying negative for h pylori. Pain is worse than ever before today so have had to leave work and come home, I have docs appt at 4 and will ask to be referred as I thankfully have bupa ins, managed to get an appt with stomach specialist for tomorrow. Terrified it's something serious :-s
I went to the doctors on Friday 25/10 and got referred to a private hospital THANKFULLY (finding the nhs doctors not very helpful at all if im honest). So Saturday 26/10 I went and saw a stomach specialist, he listened to all my symptoms and what I had been going through and how long, I also told him about the Lansoprazole which wasn't working at all (which he said if its not working, stop taking it which I did), he examined my stomach (felt it) and booked me in for an Ultrasound which was on Wednesday 30/10 and an Endsocopy on Wednesday 06/11, he didn't comment on what it could be as he said he needed to run these tests first. I asked him what I could do for the pain in the mean time, he said he didn't know as he didn't know what was wrong, which is a fair comment but to maybe try paracetmol and see if that helps.
So the pain in my stomach was still feeling horrendous, flaring up general mornings and afternoons to the point it would make me get extremely upset and not knowing what to do with myself, on Sunday 27/10 so much so I just said to my other half pls just look online and see what I can do to cope! I seriously didn't think I was going to make it to either of the coming appointments. I get upset stomach a couple of times a day too which added to the worry.
He looked online and said it sounds like I have an ulcer so basically said to me to eat every 2 hours (little and often), stop drinking tea (I only have 4 a day anyway) so I have exchanged it for 3 green teas a day, I used to have 1 can of sprite in the evening with my dinner which I have stopped as you shouldn't drink fizzy drinks, I have stopped eating spicy foods, I used to smoke 5 cigarettes a day which I have reduced by 1 so now smoke 4 a day and only have one after eating... Long story short it this seems to of stopped my stomach flaring into mega pain however the pain is still there but luckily it enabled me to go to work etc.
So I had the ultrasound, ALL CLEAR! which was a massive relief as I was petrified they was going to pick up something bad... he checked ALL my organs and said it all looks absolutely fine, which was a huge relief however they don't pick up stomach ulcers on an ultrasound so I still needed an endoscopy to see what was going on inside my stomach however the relief I had that the scan was all clear.
So it felt like a week took forever to roll round until the Endoscopy, Wednesday 6th November was finally here, which I was extremely nervous about as the thought of having a camera down my throat into my stomach which was sooooooo painful was terrifying, my apt was at 3.15 and I wasn't allowed to eat for 6 hours before hand.
I had the endoscopy under Sedation (which didn't fully work) however it didn't take them long to do it and the doctor and nurses were amazing and really put me at ease. To be honest I was just glad when it was all over, however my results were ALL CLEAR! No ulcer and from what he said my stomach all looked fine!
Well in a way it was lovely to hear however what is this pain I have been getting! So as you can imagine I am no further forward really, my stomach is still extremely tender I feel sick all of the time, I have a lump in my throat I am eating and drinking all the right things (as far as im concerned) I have had the all clear on all tests so far WHAT DO I DO ?
The consultant didn't have time to see me after the endoscopy, so now im booked in to see him on Monday 25/11 yes another two weeks away I am pinning so much on this apt, I can't surely live with this pain for the rest of my life, I don't want to go out or do anything its a struggle to come to work and I am just sick of not feeling well.
The one thing that I have changed in my life since xmas is I started taking Asda's own A-Z Vitamins and Minerals, could I per allergic maybe? I stopped taking these on Thursday 07/11 however to date haven't noticed a difference in how I feel, how long should I leave it for to see if it is them?
I know, I thought the exact thing, how can I have so much pain yet nothing be there? As I say the consultant didn't see me after like he was meant to and I have an apt with him Monday week, however I would of thought he would of told me something after the endoscopy?
I haven't lost or gained any weight I am exactly the same, as much as I feel sick I have been eating regularly (I am a creature of habbit anyway!)
Well I went privately and when the I saw the consultant he said that I would have the endoscopy (by him) and then he would see me afterwards to tell me what he saw... however on the day the apt before me over over ran so I think that's why he had to shoot off hence why he booked me in to see him Monday week.
I'm not sure what is going on with you, but a few years ago I had unexplained gastritis that the doctors did not take seriously. Everything I ate caused nausea than diarrhea. I was losing a lot of weight and since I am already naturally underweight, I didn't have much to spare. I finally was prescribed marinol, which helped with keeping food down, but if I didnt take it the symptoms returned.. I eventually completely modified my diet and did a yeast cleanse (no sugar (grains) and certain yeast friendly foods) for 2 weeks. Then I went on the Paleo diet. My symptoms disappeared.. I don’t know if this works for you.. but it sounds like you’ve tried a lot of the harder stuff already.
Thank you for writing, How long did your gastritis go on for in total? Luckily I haven't been sick as yet even though I feel on the edge of being sick all the time, however I do get a constant upset stomach.
I am finding that since I have been eating every two hours (little and often) it has helped, however I still get upset stomach in the mornings and every early evening, strange as its generally always the same sort of time and mixing up what I eat doesnt' seem to change that either.
I wondered if anyone could help me, since about January 2013 I have on and off had a dull ache in my stomach, sometimes flaring up to make me feel sick. I actually put this down to anxiety however in the past few weeks my theory has changed.
About three weeks ago my stomach flared up however to the worst pain I have experienced as yet, made me feel like I was going to be sick constantly and made me not know what to do with myself. I feel like there is a lump in my thought and my stomach feels tender and swollen when flares up feels like my stomach is on fire/knotted up!
The pain was so sever I went to the doctors (2 and a half weeks ago), my doctor felt my stomach and said it felt swollen, I told her the symtoms and she says she thinks I have gastritis and prescribed me with Lansoprazole 30mg tablets to take daily for 1 month, this however to date hasn't helped my stomach at all, the flare up comes and goes however the pain in my stomach is constant and the Lansorprazole is causing terrible upset stomach to the point I am worried to not be near a toilet.
I went back to the doctors on Tuesday 22/10 explained all of the above to her and she said I am to keep taking the tablets and she is happy to see me again in November (once the months course has been taking) however im in dispear with this pain HAD ENOUGH OF FEELING ILL and can't help but think the worse
I stayed on the Paleo diet for 6 months. I had to stop because I got married, and my husband was not as supportive of my diet. It became too hard to continue it when the other person in the house continued questioning its effectiveness. I really believed that it helped though and always recommend it to anyone with stomach problems. When I stopped doing it, I was okay for about 4 months, then the symptoms started to come back.I struggle with gastritis occasionally now... So that would be 3 years now.. but of those three years I spent 18 months of it pregnant and 6 months of it on the diet. I did not have the symptoms when I was pregnant.
My wife has twice had a similar problem to you. First time she was admitted to hospital and like you had all the tests. Nothing found t account for the pain. I suggested that she take Aloe Vera and after a few weeks it worked. When she had a follow up appointment the consultant was non committal about her remedy.
Three years ago my wife had the same symptoms again and went through the same tests plus a CT scan. Again nothing was found. She has been taking Aloe Vera every day since. She has stopped it a few times when on holiday etc but has been glad to get back on to it so now takes capsules away with her.
Just to give an update on me, since last writing I received confirmation from my consultant that the Endoscopy results were all clear, I since had blood tests testing me for pretty much everything which came back all clear, toilet sample tests all clear, and a colonoscopy which 4 biopsy's were taken again ALL CLEAR! My consultant didn't want to put me in for a CT scan as he is confident with the tests that he has done (he said if it gets worse that would be next but to go away and see how I get on)
I will have to look into Aloe Vera Capsules, out of interest, what was your reasoning to suggest for her to take the Aloe Vera Capsules? I wonder what is in them that is helping her stomach?
I have to be a little careful regarding spicy food still however I am trying to have it now and again just so my stomach gets used to it.
Hi I'm from the US .. I'm dealing with the sane things now ... Nothing worked ... Was taking Prilosec I mean everything lol.. The doc said I might she. Pylori so they put me on antibiotics that I hate. Just waiting on another endoscopy. I'm also waiting for my stool test. I keep hearing ppl say to try Bragg's apple cider vinegar. I put a capful in my water and felt better. Aloe Vera did help me in the past but I think I need to try another brand. I cut out eating everything. I can only tolerate chicken mainly now. I hope we do get better. The stress is killing me. I feel your pain Jenny... I hope they find a cure soon
Since last writing I feel like I am getting somewhere (well my stomach isn't a daily nightmare, at the moment anyway), as I said I am still taking the Acidophilus Plus capsules which I think are my savour! Since taking these it seems to of made a massive impact on my stomach, In 5 1/2 weeks I have just had 3 flare ups! which is amazing compared to having it daily for 3 1/2 MONTHS!
Last week (due to the flare ups I had again - which all happened in the same week) I decided to go to a nutritionist and have a food allergy test done. It didn't show that I had any sever food allergies however there was about 8 things that showed up that ""stressed"" my digestive system if eaten, so now I have changed my diet again so I only have those items in small amounts on occasion. I hope this is the cure!
Very interesting and definately sounds like a posibility as all my sypthoms are listed! i will mention to my stomach specialist when I next see him.
I am curious to find out what food you are avoiding. I have had the EXACT same symptoms. 2 years ago, I went to my doctor, and she suggested that I may have an intolerance to gluten. She suggested I remove all gluten from my diet, and take probiotics. I did that, and felt so much better after 10 days. I still have flare-ups now and then, and have been wondering if I have an intolerance to other foods as well. So far, I think it may be nuts, egg yolks, brocolli, and aspartame. This week, I have had severe flare-ups, and have become very nervous in what I can eat. I am wondering if I also have an intolerance to dairy products.
I went to see my doctor (unfortunately not the same one that recommended going gluten-free) and she has ordered an ultrasound for tomorrow. She thinks it is my appendix. My 'gut' feeling is that she is wrong, and do not want to go through a bunch of tests.
I have the same thing. We have an over the counter medicine called mylanta and I drink that all the time all it is is an antacid it helps sort of.
I have been in and out of doctors also blood test ultrasound x rays all come up perfectly fine.
But I'm kind of at a standstill I don't know what to do stage of the game also
I do have known food allergies
I'm allergic to nuts berries sulfites nitrates nitrites processed meats of any kind
I should add my particular symptoms get better with food
If I don't eat is when it actually hurts but I get very very cold
I feel my best first thing in the morning I usually start to feel sick 2 o'clock in the afternoon not really sure what significant about that time 2 o'clock in the afternoon is when everything rears its ugly head
The one I went to was done by holding a silver tube in one hand and then on my other hand the lady put on and off a silver point to the tip of my finger, not sure if it pierced the skin or not if im honest, but the computer took readings from it.
in Nov of 2009 i had a Nissen fundoplication, its a surgery where they wrap the top of my esophagus with a mesh to keep stomach acids from splashing up and causing extreme pain. it reduced my pain dramatically for about 2 years, and in 2011 the pain came back, i was checked for another hernia, ulcers, h pylori, celiacs disease, and many others. all results came back negative. I began just to live with the pain as a part of day to day life. about 4 months ago it got so bad that i had completely stopped eating and if i did eat i became very sick and dizzy. i again went to the doctor had much of the same tests done and again no results that would indicate a reason why it hurts. I have quit smoking, drinking alcohol and soda pop, spicy foods are unfortunately no longer a part of my life, and i am now no longer able to bend over and pick things up as it causes stomach pain. reading through your messages it sounds very similar to where i am at as well. Aloe Vera seems to help somewhat, however there is one thing i have tried that assists with helping subdue the pain so that i can eat, and that is the ingestion of cannabis.
Now i no this is always a sensitive topic, and is still illegal in most states in the US to include the state that i live in. but there is some medical research done into the effects of cannabis on stomach pain such as what i have and seemingly what you have as well. ""smoking"" of it DOES NOT HELP ME, in fact it almost makes it worse at times, however my mother lives in a state where it is legal to use for medical purposes, and i have been ingesting it for roughly a month and have been able to eat and maintain my lifestyle. I thought that i would share this with you as it seems like you have exhausted many resources and although its not the most ""professional and desirable"" way of treating this, it is working for me. I Hope that this helps you out.
Hi. I was wondering if I could have some Help with the same problem. I'm 17 years old and usually a very healthy girl. With no problems what so ever. Nearly 3 weeks ago, on a Thursday. I got up and did my usual routine, things that I would usually do and went out for food with my friends that night. I went to bed completely fine that night with no problems. at 2am the next morning I was woken up with unreal
Very good idea also, I just recently received my medicinal marijuana card back in April 2014.my girlfriend said that there's capsules for gastro problems. And she wants to get them and have her mom try themso of course the s bother thingsame idea popped into my head also.today being the third daythat I'm in so much pain I'm ready to go back to the ER like I did years ago when I found out my diagnosis as really bad acute gastritis.
although I don't see that happening considering my shoulder is dilapidated,/ing now effecting my elbow! It just hurts so bad knowing that I spent years for 8 hours a day to train my body to do things normal people cant do, to get hit by a car,find out I have degenerative disc disease among MANY OTHER THINGS.I Also had Kawasaki disease as a child and because it's such a rare disease I figured maybe they should have followed me my whole life to see how it effects you 30 years later.I wish much luck to all of youmany prayers and much love God bless Sincerely
I wish my doctors at my pain clinic would use the same common sense.all they do is mask the real problems, shots on my knees shots on my shoulders shots in my elbowsback procedures rhyzotomy they go in and burn off 13 pinched nerve give me a walking epidural gram and do a facet joint block,they did the same thing to my neck twice it didn't work so now they did the rhyzotomy on my neck w 4 herniated disc and one bulging herniated discs.I just recently received my medicine medical marijuana card back in AprilI went to a dr and got his approval for chronic painso I haven't tried much but the hash seems to work out and I know they have stomach pills also in little capsules that I might try also!
I am also having gastritis.its been a year.. Really tired of the dull pain in upper abdomen and medicines also not working. Had done endoscopy also.. Really worried, what is happening with me : (
Unfortunately I am know further forward. Still get the same syptoms swollen upper stomach and bad upset stomach regularly, not every day like it was however guaranteed minimum once a week I really don't know what is causing it as is the same whatever I eat, if I am stressed or not!
The only thing I can think may be causing it is run down/tiredness ? Which I am all the time! lol
Thank you so much for your post, unfortunately as much as I wish i had I have not yet got round to trying Yoga, however I am extremely keen still to do so!
Unfotunately I lead a very hectic lifestyle and am finding it difficult to fit anything else in, however new years resolution is to start
I am from the United states and like you have been experiencing the same exact thing as you. Spent alot of time in and out of doctors and emergency rooms only to find out that nobody knows what was wrong with me. I finally found a doctor in my town who is also a younger one and he told me it was caused by anxiety. He ended up putting me on an anti depressant which eventually stopped the pain
I have nearly all the same symptoms as you except I use to just feel like getting sick all the time where now I do. At first they thought it was ulsers then H pylori but they haven't got a clue really my stomach pains are starting to get out of hand now and all the tests are coming back clear any advise .?
It's amazing that stomachs can behave like this with no known cause. It's my story, too, so my heart goes out to those who suffer with like issues. I've had gobs of tests, endoscopies, CTs, blood tests, etc etc. My doctor cannot tell me why my stomach hurts at the very top, sometimes burns, sometimes a dull ache. This time it has been ongoing, not constant (comes and goes) for 16 months. More frequent and small meals help. I do have a reflux problem and IBS. I have been taking Nexium for years but try to take it only 3 times a week instead of every day. I also use Kefir at least several times a week. Still, I wish I knew what causes this. One of my docs told me a lot of people have this problem and no cause is discovered. Frustrating at best.
I am at my wits end as well, such a mystery and I wish I could find some answers. With me, my pain comes in cycles/flares, I can have a constant pain which is achey/twinges in the upper central abdomen, about 2 inches above my belly button. My pain will last anywhere from a few weeks to a few months, then magically disappears, this is why I call it flares. Have had all the tests a few years back. Ultrasound, endoscopy, colonoscopy, tested for celiac etc... My pain is constant, it does very in intensity through the day, but it's always there, smack dab in the middle of my upper abdomen. Nothing I eat makes it worse or better, bowels are soft than hard, so i was told it's ibs. But why would ibs come and go like this? I can sometimes go months and be fine, but when it does happen, I have it for weeks/months and it is relentless. The only thing my ultrasound ever showed was a fatty liver (which I have been told is not the source of my pain) and if even I did think it was this, my pain is central, not to the right (where your liver is) My endocopy a few years back only showed mild inflammation, could these be gastritis attacks? Any info/input would be greatly appreciated...thanks
I had your symptoms years ago and it took 2.1/2 years for doctors to tell me I had Mucous Colitis! I was put on three different drugs which did help but never put it away. I changed my life style/diet and that helped. I came off the medication because of the worry of all the dude affects! I was then tested positive for H-Pylori and was put on triple therapy antibiotics and felt better. But have gone on vicious cycle of infections v antibiotics and lots of inflammation!
Hi Pam, i can relate to your Flares as thats exactly what i have. I had an attack 3 weeks ago and all my stomach felt on fire and swollen, it was excruciating. My doctors said my stomach felt swollen as i told her i thought the swelling was affecting my bladder as i could feel pressure on it making me need to wee more often. I too was told i had a small patch of inflammation after an endoscopy, also a small hiatus hernia. I am really scared of it becoming a regular thing as i am worried what damage it can do to my stomach. Ihave had 2 ultrasounds this year and also told i have slightly fatty liver. Hope someone can come up with a way to help us all cure this painful condition.
All I can say is that reading all of these has been a HUGE releif for me. I have been dealing with the same symptoms discussed on this board for close to 4 years now. Utrasound, endoscopy, cat scans all check out normal. I have seen 4 doctors, digestion specialists. Everyone says ""there is nothing wrong with you."" I questions if it could be anxiety related, but have been told it is not (even though is causes it) The last thing I was told was thast I must have gotten a bacterial infection that still lingers. I have been on pro-biotics and am currently taking panterprozale for stomach acid and slight inlfmation in my esophagus. I have vowed to find a ""cure"" for myself. Andi, I will. Knowing that you all are out there helps me know I am not in this alone. Anything I find, I will share. I have tried to describe it to other people, but they simpy cannot understand what it is to live with this day in and day out. It is constantly on my mind and I am sure all of yours. If anyone has heard of any new remedies please share.
Thank you all so much for the information. I'm about 6 months into this problem, but I get severe pain in the middle of my chest too. My stomach hurts all the time and sometimes it's so bad I'm close to doubling over. I'm also nauseaus all the time, but don't vomit. The pain in my chest gets that bad too and will hurt into my back. Most times I feel hungry even after I've eaten a full meal, so I will try to eat something mild thinking it will help and then I'm really full and feel worse than when I started.
Hi great to find this.my symptoms started suddenly on my birthday
It looks like I'm in the same boat. About 3 years ago I began having stomach aches, dull pain in my stomach, like someone put a brick in there for fun. After about 2 weeks of constant pain I went through all the usual tests, from blood, scans, endo/colonoscopy, h-pylori, etc etc.
3 months later, Docs said it was stress related and IBS was main diagnosis. I didn't lose weight, or had bathroom problems.
I thought I was truly doomed, then one day it went away like magic, literally magic. Haven't had the pain since until last week after a spicy meal. I thought it was just the food, but I'm a week in and quite honestly terrified. I don't know if I can go through another few months of this day in and day out.
good luck. I would like to know what you're told. I have been having the same symptoms for 4 years. All tests show nothing, thankfully. Been on pantaprozol for a year. Trying to come off now. Need to find the source not just cover it up.
yes, I've had them both, not on this occasion as I'm only a week and 1 day into the pain again, and the thought of doing them again is not pleasant to be honest!
I have been suffering with severe pain and diarrhea for years now. 2 weeks ago I was hospitalized and did all the tests (colonoscopy, endoscopy, ultra sound, Xray, CT scan, MRI, stool and blood testing for bugs) EVERYTHING CAME OUT FINE. I am so frustrated as I am a college student trying to do well in school and being woken up by intense pain. I tried going paleo, now I'm just dairy free, they put me on anti biotics but I'm going to stop them because truthfully at this point I have little faith in western ""classic"" treatments and feel as if the answer lies in something more homeopathic. Have you had any luck? Thank you. This is such a struggle and so so frustrating.
I had to give up tea coffee fruit juices all I drink is boiled water and I had to stay away from sugar all I eat is salmon with all purpose seasoning in over with boiled rice salad tuna steak
I wondered if anyone could help me, since about January 2013 I have on and off had a dull ache in my stomach, sometimes flaring up to make me feel sick. I actually put this down to anxiety however in the past few weeks my theory has changed.
About three weeks ago my stomach flared up however to the worst pain I have experienced as yet, made me feel like I was going to be sick constantly and made me not know what to do with myself. I feel like there is a lump in my thought and my stomach feels tender and swollen when flares up feels like my stomach is on fire/knotted up!
The pain was so sever I went to the doctors (2 and a half weeks ago), my doctor felt my stomach and said it felt swollen, I told her the symtoms and she says she thinks I have gastritis and prescribed me with Lansoprazole 30mg tablets to take daily for 1 month, this however to date hasn't helped my stomach at all, the flare up comes and goes however the pain in my stomach is constant and the Lansorprazole is causing terrible upset stomach to the point I am worried to not be near a toilet.
I went back to the doctors on Tuesday 22/10 explained all of the above to her and she said I am to keep taking the tablets and she is happy to see me again in November (once the months course has been taking) however im in dispear with this pain HAD ENOUGH OF FEELING ILL and can't help but think the worse
thank you so much for your message, very interesting and could definitely be a possibility! I had an ultrasound of my organs but nothing came up however maybe they wasn't thorough around my uterus?
I am due to go to the doctors for a smear over the next could of weeks so will speak to the nurse then.
I had stomach pain, bloating , nausea and really bad periods. The pain would vary from really bad to just like cramps. My last fibroid got so big it was affecting my kidney. I had trouble going to the bathroom because it go so big. Small fibroids can just make you uncomfortable. There are two types of ultrasounds, the first is one where they put the gel on you and move it around over your uterus. The other is that they put wand with a camera in side of your uterus and see if there is any fibroids and the location of them. I hope this helps
Thanks Amy, the only symptom that I don't have is really bad periods however the others are the same.
Last year (6 months ago) I was diagnosed with CIN 3 cervical cells which I had to have removed I wonder if it could all be linked maybe....
My symptoms have been exactly like yours but over a few years. More frequent now but all clear everywhere like you. I am having ct scan for closer look at upper abdomen and pancreas now. Did you take a few supplements each day or any other meds we could have in common that could cause it? What does the aloe Vera do? Do you get upper abdominal pain in middle of night?
Hey I'm from Canada and iv been experiencing the exact same problems for the past 3years! Everyday is a struggle constant nausea, direahha, constipation, major stomach aches, feeling like total crap. Iv had so many tests run on me and everything cams back negative which is so frustrating cause there's gotta be a reason as to why many of us feel this way. When I was pregnant with my daughter all the problems had gone even for 2 months after she was born I thought it had finally gone away but I was wrong it came back full throttle! Hope someone figures this out soon
Hi everyone! I have similar symptoms for about 6 yrs now. I've been in and out of hospitals trying to figure out what's wrong, my last visit was last week and I was in the hospital for 2 days. I had an ultrasound, and tons of blood tests and a stool sample test. They wanted to do an endoscopy but they decided it wasn't the best time since I'm 27 weeks pregnant. Blood work came out great and I'm still waiting to hear on the stool sample plus a separate blood test to check for an auto immune disease. My pain starts below the rib cage and extends to my right backside. The ultrasound came back normal. Gallbladder, lived, and pancreas looked fine but I'm still having this extreme pain. They think it could be a number of things...possibly microscopic gallstones, possibly an auto immune disease, possibly celiac disease, or even the pancreas but can only be sure until I have that endoscopy. I'm due in June so I can't wait! I also wanted to mention that the only thing that seems to take the pain away for small amounts of time is a heating pad. They prescribed me Zantac 150 mg and some lidocaine patches which haven't helped. I just want answers and soon.
I am having similar symptoms as well.
I also have been having stomach pains. I've been to hospital 3 different times. And everything cam back normal. It doesn't make since to me to be in so much pain and it be nothing. I have pains all throughout my stomach.. My sides, and my back. Even a little lower then my stomach. Some pains are sharp, shooting, radiating, cramping. Right now I'm having pains in my right ribs. And lower back. There were days I would feel like something is in my throat, and some nausea. The pains are getting more consistent. I have not gone to the doctor yet, but as bad as it is getting guess I will have to soon. What kind of dr. Should I even go to? My primary doctor, my ob? After reading everyone's posts, I'm thinking of looking into the aloe Vera capsules or some probiotics. Bt I need something!! And what pain medicine should I take? Advil, Tylenol, alieve? I need help!!
I pray by now you have found relief from your GI symptoms. For many years, I also have suffered with all kinds of persistant abdominal pain and discomfort. Three different doctors, Gastroenterologist, could not come up with anything more than IBS (Irritated Bowel Syndrom). If you have not been able to find the etiology of your pain, you might try getting off all dairy products. A drug named Bentyl helps with my cramps along with a heating pad.
have you had your CT Scan Yet? I went back to the doctors last week absolutely useless! The doctor I saw said ""you have ibs"" and prescribed me laxatives! (I do not need laxitives to say the least!) anyway, I went to my chemist (he is fantastic I would say better than I doctor) He said ""don't take this prescription - yes it is a laxitve and I don't think you have ibs!"" he said to go to the supermarket and buy ""ONKEN NATURAL YOGURT"" and take a tablespoon morning, lunch and night, basically this has live good bacteria in (acidiphilu in particular which is what I have been taking in tablet form) he said the live yogurt is better and the tablets are processed ect.
So I have been doing just that for just under a week now, only time will tell, my chemist thinks that its an imbalance of bacteria in my stomach which is causing this and by having this yogurt after time it should even itself out again and become normal! I have stopped my Acidiphilus tablets and just having the yogurt.... only time will tell.
Meanwhile one good thing about going to the doctors, I asked to be referred to see the stomach specialist again, so I am now booked in to see my specialist end of April (nhs is a waiting game) so hopefully he will refer me for a CT scan as that was what he said last time!
I haven't tried the aloe vera yet, im going to see how I get on with the yogurt and take it from there.
Anyway my wife has been taking it for about 19 years and is still here to tell the tale.
Very interesting! sounds like im going through what she did!
Well I will see how I get on when I see the consultant / CT Scan (if he still agrees I need this) if that's all clear and there is another silence I will definitely try the aloe vera!
For years because of not being good at getting up in the morning my breakfast consisted of two ginger biscuits and a cup of tea. I ate several apples a day as our house at that time had been built on the site of an orchard.
Recently, I’ve had two incidences of positive feedback (yes - it’s amazing!) regarding treatment advice I gave for nausea. In both cases, I had advised eating a humble ginger biscuit and in both cases the feedback was it worked surprisingly well. One patient was shocked that a young-ish doctor like myself would suggest ginger over a prescribed anti-emetic. From personal experience of being on a boat pre- scuba diving, ginger was a great cure for my sea-sickness.
Had ct scan back. All clear but they are saying probably pancreatitis as had that 13 years ago for a year. No ssymptoms of this at all though. I have got cysts on one kidney but they mean nothing. Now they are looking to see if maybe some kind of bowel issue slthough i have no symotoms there at all! Basically no idea still
Thanks Jenny for sharing your story here. I am Aman Chopra from India and i have very similar symptoms as you have. I have this stomach ache since Sep 2013. All test including CT Scan, Endoscopy, Colonoscopy are done but all reports suggest i am fine.
Doctors have diagnosed it with IBS and i am not sure it's helping me either. I am going to try Aloe Vera Supplements as suggested above or Acidophilus tablets to check if it works for me. Keep sharing!
Hi, Jenny, my husband has had the same symptoms for over a year. We went to Domnican Republic and many of our group were ill with sickness diarroheah. My husband wasn't ill at the time but got ill when we got home. He was diagnosed with h pylori and took two courses of the three treatments (2 antibiotics and one gastro medicine). He didn't get any better and now having had two endoscopies, a colonoscopy, a CT scan, including putting dye into his body, two ultrasound scans, numerous blood tests, stool samples etc everything is coming back clear. He too was given laxatives despite not being constipated. He was told by one doctor that it was probably (!) IBS but he has none of the usual IBS symptoms. At the last appointment he was given a further blood test to look for coealic disease. We are due back to see consultant on 24 April. I (we) are almost positive it is not coealiac as he is not sick, does not have diarrohea. His symptoms are constant nausea coupled with stomach pain and the feeling of being stabbed between shoulder blades.
Had the same thing was put on omeprazole 20mg after2 weeks ok now just flares up when stressed , so I take them when needed only for few weeks untill feeling better , endoscopy last time showed inflammation gastritis first 2 endoscopy showed nothing , because the omeprazole had cleared it up before I had them , I know how depressing it can be , been on going on and off for last 15 yrs
Hi Maria, I see that your post is very old but I have to try at least. My mom has been suffering from the same symptoms as your husband. An excruciating pain in her stomach or pancreatic area, she has gone through all the tests - endoscopie, a colonoscopy, a CT scan, two ultrasound scans, numerous blood tests, stool samples etc and everything comes out good. Based on her results she should be the healthiest person on Earth but she's in so much pain anytime she eats anything or drinks anything. Now she's basically not eating to prevent the pain, but she's loosing tons of weight and we are worried how much longer can she live like this. I see you wrote that some doctor said that there is some part of a stomach that is hard to see from any kind of test . Have you had any luck figuring out what was the problem with your husband? I really hope that you have already figured it out and that your husband is feeling better now. Please let me know if you have any update or any information that could help us. Thank you! Martina
Hi, how is your Mother doing now? She sounds just like me. I went 3 weeks without eating due to fear of the pain. Then I eased back into eating for 1 week, now I'm back in the same pain. I have appt with gastro dr this week, am praying for answers.
I found your story interesting as I have a similar problem in the past 6 YEARS
It all started in 2008 when I was diagnosed with pancreatitis.
After a couple of days of hospitalisation and diet I was free to go home however I had to go back for blood tests to check if my pancreas is all good
The blood test came back, pancreas is good but my thrombocyts (red blood cells) are waaaay to low (Normally you'd have 250 000, I had 30 000) which is causing bleeding. Everywhere. Anytime. Internal as well. So I was hospitalised again, for weeks.
I had a blood condition which I was prescribed STEROIDS for.. (Medrol).
In the hospital all they said to me was: ""Be careful with the steroids, the can cause you stomach pain""... Well, appareantly I wasn't careful enough because I've been living with this unexplainable pain in the past 6 YEARS!!!!!
I was told that your body needs about 5 years to get rid of the traces of steroids which was last year and nothing happened....
I was taking probiotics and different tablets for stomach care but nothing worked.
I've been trying to find out what causes the pain for 5-6 years now, with no success
So I usually associate the pain with hunger.... If i eat, it gets better, if not, it just gets worse
I've done all sorts of tests, tried gastroscopy, tablets, vitamins and nothing seemed to ease my pain.
When I had my tests done, the doctor came to me saying that the good news is that everything is fine, and the bad news is that everything is fine... So it's very good that there are no visible symptoms of some serious condition, but it doesn't help me and I can't have a good quality of life at the age of 24.
I always have to make sure I've got some snacks in my bag otherwise I panic and become agitated again.
I can't really lose weight, but I can gain kilos very quickly and easily..
It's hard to explain to my mind for example that I'm not hungry and I do not need those carbs, but my body tells me otherwise and in order to keep my body happy and to be able to work, I have to give my body what it ""needs"" otherwise i can't function...
I've tried to settle my stomach pain with fruits, nuts, good fats and healthy stuff but I've got a feeling that I'm now addicted to carbohydrates and if I don't have it, the pain will kill me.........it's a vicious circle, because I need to stop eating so much carbs for the pain the go away, but if I don't have it I feel hungry ALL THE TIME.